Sadly… That statement holds a degree of truth. Southwest Missouri is notorious for that.
Keep me in your prayers
That was the third time the Rangers tied the score. It was a good development considering the Sens had a goal taken away upon review on a puck that rattled off the crossbar and bounced behind Henrik precariously close to the goal line.
Modern British Sculpture at the Royal Academy, definitely worth a look-see, however do not under pain of death or torture or four more years of Nick Clegg read the nonsensical art speak on the exhibition's walls.
Bibliography:
Anyway, the reason we ended up riding around on horses for transportation is because of how they evolved. They are plant eaters and eating plants requires a lot of intestines to digest. Eating meat takes a lot less in the way of intestines so that's why cows and horses have those big giant bellies and cats and dogs don't. Horses and cows have to carry around all those guts. So in order to carry around all that weight, horses and cows have thick solid spines. That's why we can sit on their backs without snapping their spines!
Thought you might like to see some of the photos that my wife took down in southern Utah.
I’m disabled because the world is set up for people in the middle of the bell curve, not because there is anything wrong with me.
When looking at old drawings I love to get in close and check out the subtle nuances of the artist's mark making... fun little twists and turns of the drawing instrument which create the character of the work. The reference photo for this one was taken at the Highland's Community Garden, in our neighbourhood. You might remember the oil painting I did last fall of a sunflower (called Highland Sun) from the same stand of majestic blooms...
It is interesting how some goods travel from one country to another. What is considered old-fashioned in one place may be highly desirable in another. Things disregarded in France have long been coveted by the English.
The lens plate is made up of a few parts. The lens is encased in a plastic ring, with another plastic ring that screws in place to hold the lens in place. You may want to remove this to clean the lens. The lens is probably supposed to come out, but mine was in pretty tight. The bulb switch just pulls out, but there isn't really any reason to do so.
I realize this is not the end of the world - but some days it sort of feels like it. I'm seriously worried that I might not even be able to start my half marathon on August 21st - let alone complete it in 1:55. I haven't given up but I have adjusted my goals. I just want to run. I don't care how long it takes me - I just want to experience the journey. I don't even want to consider how awful it would be to be sitting on the sidelines. And to add insult to injury (literally) - this is my fundraising race! How do you solicit funds for a race you might not even be able to complete? Ugh!!
In closing, think about it like this: Money is not everything, but it darn sure helps. But money to us is different than money to someone who has none.** When you have less money than you require, or need then you lack in part of your life. This is a sad reality for us here, but even greater abroad. I have a friend right now showing me just how big God can be if you let him, and it is amazing to see the transformation that is occurring in him both spiritually as well as physically. My pal, and and all around great guy, Brian Carpenter is walking his feet raw on a pathway known as the Appalachian trail as we speak. (I will put a link to his blog on my blog roll, as well as add it to the bottom of the page.) He is truly living like he is dying right now. He is “walking for water” to fund wells for those that walk miles daily to secure water for their families. This is something passionate that he has felt in his heart and is answering a calling to do so. He is right now a month in, and has already done great things by gathering enough money to fully fund one well so far! This is what God needs us to do. Die to ourselves, and put others needs before ours. Be the big brother to a person in need, and show love when you can. Be a helping hand like no other, and walk until your feet are ready to bleed because no sacrifice is as great as the one that God made for us by sending Christ to be crucified. Be the hands and feet, heart and spirit of God to somebody else. He will prosper you as He has stated. He would not forsake us, and so He simply asks us to not forsake others. Is that too much to ask of someone that you have given everything to?
Once he’s disappeared round the corner, I dash upstairs to look under my pillow for the romantic note he always leaves me whenever he’s away for the night – oh, no, sorry, I was just remembering my brief sojourn in that parallel universe…
We got to choose our own groups and brainstorm cool ideas on the very first day, and we were shown how to use high quality video cameras for the next filming day. We also got to mess around with the props, and get ready for the next day so we looked exactly how we imagined ourselves.
What it made me start to think at first was, are commercials going to get funnier or more creative if online viewing is what TV is turning to? Then, it made me wonder…
This is a good basic recipe, easily adapted with other flavour combinations and great for detailed shapes and patterns.
Angie does a wonderful job in creating custom gift baskets for any occasion. I have been both a recipient and a giver of her wonderful baskets and have never been disappointed. She really takes care to create wonderful, one of a kind, gifts just for you. She can work with any budget too!
Stayed tuned tomorrow, I have a special "secret" project that I am going to do for my honey and I will share with you ;)
I found the recipe at Recipe Girl and while I found the idea enticing, I was a bit skeptical that the pancakes would turn out to taste like a cinnamon roll.
About the author: Eric Arvin resides in the same sleepy Indiana river town where he grew up. He graduated from Hanover College with a Bachelors in History. He has lived, for brief periods, in Italy and Australia. He has survived brain surgery and his own loud-mouthed personal demons. Eric is the author of THE REST IS ILLUSION, SUBSURDITY, SIMPLE MEN, WOKE UP IN A STRANGE PLACE, and various other sundry and not-so-sundry writings. He intends to live the rest of his days with tongue in cheek and eyes set to roam
“Yeah! I’ll give it all!” The boy rushed to his room and returned with about three centimeters worth of pennies. The mom also acquired her much larger jar of one-cent coins, and although it probably added up to only a couple of dollars and definitely weighed down my poor collection bag, that family had given the most precious donation. They gave all they had, which was pennies – and every one of them counted. What I did when I got home was exchange all of those small coins for larger ones, because, like a relatively large amount of the population, I have a penny collection.
Exhibit C
Post a screenshot from the bold you're arena adapted now:
She decided to create an independent label with her brother Jimmy Jamez, a music producer. Together they founded EBROS and many other companies to finance Sindy Rush’s career.
Saw the movie: 3
½ cup cocoa powder
Holding the cone with your left hand., fill the one third of the cone with the rice and peanut mixture, add your fillings, and top with more rice. The zongzi should be packed pretty tight with no loose edges. Using the palm of your right hand, fold over the the ends of the leaves and press the rice into the cone flat. Do not roll the leaves or push the rice, they should be packed evenly using a pressing motion. The left hand should be holding the shape of the cone with the thumb and index finger wrapped around the top of the cone. In one smooth even motion, slightly curl the thumb and index finger of the left hand (turning the shape of the cone from a full circle to a circle with a flattened side) and use the right hand to hold the ends of the leaves flat against the cone. All the rice should be covered with bamboo leaves now. While holding the zongzi tight in the center of the cone with the left hand, use the right hand to fold the leaves over the edges of the cone in a triangular shape. The round cone has now become a triangle. At the top of the triangle (base end of the leaves), fold over the ends. Wrap the zongzi in the middle (it should include the end of the leaves that were folded over) by using a downward pulling motion. This will pull the string tightly. Wrap at least twice and secure with a slippery hitch. You may also double knot, but the slippery hitch allows for easy opening of the zongzi with a single pull.
Than mine,
So they moved me to my delivery bed, my brother-in-law showed up to wait with the kids in the hallway, and as I laid there determined to stick to my decision to go au natural, my hubby kept asking the nurses if I could still get the epidural. Yeah, easy for him. He wouldn't have to get a ginormous needle in his back and a tube put up his yahoo. No thanks. I'll just take the regular ole pain thank you very much. I'm beginning to wonder though if perhaps he was asking for the epi for himself. It did seem to bother him quite a bit that I was in a constant state of moaning. Poor thing...him I mean.
Then you go home.
Mike, the fellow ordered to pay the tickets, isn't the driver, and has nothing to do with the UPS truck. The UPS guy said his truck gets tickets regularly.
I started my December Daily on the 1st and so far so good. I've made it 4 days and I am finishing up day 4 today. Yay! This was my Day 1 photo. I even scrapped a layout about my goal of making it thru all 25 days!!
The second diary has much longer, rambling entries and is therefore much juicier. I’ve gathered from my reading that at the time the unnamed writer had a boyfriend named Devin, but that didn’t stop her from meeting a boy she had a crush on named Christian at a local park in this undated entry:
Hyperbole? Is there anyone who thinks Western Civilisation is on the ascendant? Sure, our societies are getting fairer and more just, but our influence is world affairs is lessening. A greater proportion of the world's population live according to Islam now that ever before, and that Islam is becoming more and more intolerant as the effects of Saudi money take hold. In fact, "their" ideas and values are seeping into the West far faster than "ours" are, and what progress has been made there is being reversed.
Me: A wha...
- Falafel + fries 8 euro
continued, bolstered by her response. “I was given a house. That’s all I knew. I came here, gratefully, and have done nothing to bring dishonor to the memory of Victor and Flora’s life together. What you two have been up to is none of my business.”
Starring: Brandon Maggart, Jeffrey DeMunn, Dianne Hull, Andy Fenwick, Brian Neville and Joe Jamrog.
“It used to be at beer festivals, I was pretty much the only gal. Now it’s definitely venturing more toward 60-40” with women being the 40 percent, says Morrison, who has been involved in the craft beer scene for nearly 15 years.
However, insiders say that most of these areas have instead been destroyed by “illegal logging” practices, meaning that the trees have instead been clear felled and very little of the wood has been declared through the official channels and therefore properly taxed.
Please accept my apology.
I disagree with his rankings and see fit to give you my rankings:
Rotti is dying, too, and he’s got a nutbag family who likes to be vulgar, and there’s a guy called Grave Robber who pulls some chemical out of dead bodies to make a blue drug. To REPO’s credit, then, the narrative, like the musical numbers, doesn’t suffer from a lack of ambition.
Viva freedom!
After my induction by shark head I gave Iris “side” as she calls breastfeeding. I didn’t realise at the time that that would be the last time she fed before she was a big sister! Whenever I got a contraction while we were feeding I wanted to rip her off the breast because being touched during a contraction felt very uncomfortable. She was also heavy and pressing herself against my stomach. I ended up taking her off a couple of times for contractions during that feed.
I thought I would do a couple of posts on things we are doing around the home to get ready and organized to head back to school! Sounds like a good time right?
(27) 1 Thessalonians 1:8
And whatever your labors and aspirations,
Some fiddle things gradually tell that something wrong with Charlie and Emily, then Raymond starts to have knot on his stomach. He struggles to solve something invisible, though his clumsiness seems to make things worsen and tighten the knot. And then...
And yet and the end of the film, Perseus is all tolerant of Zeus because he helped him get rid of Hades. There’s no, “Look, Zeus, I’m not coming to live with you on Olympus because you raped my mom and didn’t lift a finger to save her or me. Thanks for helping with Hades, but you’re still a huge f*cking dick, and I hope you catch chlamydia, you philandering old perv-
I had a bowl of porridge, toast and a caffeine lucozade. My plan for energy on the run was as follows:
Aristotle’s analysis identified reason as the key human virtue that distinguishes us from other animals. Thomas Aquinas, John Locke, Thomas Hobbes, and the other major figures in natural law thinking have all followed suit. So, if it is reason, if it is our advanced capacity for logical and speculative thought, that differentiates humans from the rest of the animal kingdom, then it is here that we will find the core of a human natural law.
The children also seem to be taking more and more of an interest in working with the Botany puzzles and matching, as well as the continent maps and Zoology puzzles and matching. These are all wonderful skills that help them become keen observers and helps them become familiar with the world in which they live in.
Father Brady however, failed to inform any parent of the children in the group that they had been abused. Nor were the police told of Smyth’s crimes against them. http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/uk-northern-ireland-17853126
The 10 projects that receive the most votes from July 20 through August 10 will proceed to the final judging round, where five organizations will be chosen to each receive a $50,000 grant to further their work. Your vote today will help us become one of those finalists, enabling us to help improve the life of Halimah and more women like her in Indonesia.
You tackle it one bite at a time.
» And when they meet the woman of their dreams, it may be a rocky road to happily-ever-after, but once they get there, it’s forever.
3) Fold the mixture until they combine well.
5. Act Cocky
with,
The "Island" may very well have been a "real island" that had fantastical properties. It could be an "Island" that was utilized by rich people, military, scientists (The DeGroots, Hanso, Mittleos, Mittlewerk) for the purpose of study, and a place to bring "lost" people and rehabilitate them. Or even a metaphysical level of the journey. For the castaways this still would be the place that they did share their coming together via a staged plane crash, the tests and challenges they faced under the guise of a game, where they would learn to confront their demons, face their fears, see truth, end addiction, forgive themselves, forgive others, get over abandonment issues and other emotional issues that paralyzed them, learn to let go of their attachments and suffering and then be free to live their lives in the "real world". It would have been this time spent together that was indeed the most important to Jack, Locke and the rest of the castaways. They were the people who meant the most in the most important time of their lives, who shared in their life changing growth.
In this new cycle, step up and acknowledge that you are a co-creator of the reality that you are experiencing. We remind you once again to let go of all your emotional issues that are not supporting you or your desires. Let go of your fears, your resentments, your guilt, let go of all the sorrow and grief that you carry in your body. Stop telling your story that reinforces those disempowering feelings. There are no victims but there are powerful beings experiencing an illusion of powerlessness.
But first, what's the difference between an ogre and a troll? The ogre is French and the troll is Norwegian. At least, ogres are first spoken of in French literature in the late 12th century and later in Italy as well, while trolls are solidly Scandinavian. (See cave troll illustration by John Bauer, left.) An ogre is generally oversize, ugly, and brutish. Sometimes he is also a giant. Trolls seem a little less harmful to people, though some have been described as man-eaters. Trolls are said to be nocturnal, turning to stone if caught abroad when the sun comes up. Both ogres and trolls are thought of as being dense, which means that a small, clever human can trick them despite their immense physical strength.
We had to see Middlebury after Elsa received notice that she was invited to be a Posse finalist. This was something that we had not expected, and when we had to guess about the odds of this happening for her, we guessed that she had better odds at being accepted to her top choice school ED1 than she had of becoming a Posse finalist. So we applied to her top choice school ED1.
LAUNDRY LIQUID
Jessica Simpson has given birth to a baby girl Tuesday May 1, 2012.
That's not going cheap in the sales
It's true that I have prepared a surprise box for her to wake up to Saturday morning, complete with "bloons" (balloons), a bubble machine that promises to blow a GAZILLION of them, and other things that I know will fascinate her blooming brain and hopefully allow her to forget that her mama and daddy are not with her.
The city tops in crime. molestation, rapes, killings road rage you name it Delhi has it all. Women are unsafe in the capital. Very rarely one finds a stranger ready to help. The trust issue is missing completely especially in New Delhi.
U.S. bankruptcy and your own assumpsit, unjust enrichment and quantum
Carol here and I'm hosting this weeks challenge, hope you've had a good week and are ready for a new challenge theme. This week I decided to choose butterflies and bows, two of my favourite things. Our sponsor is our fabulous Crafts and Me Store and the lucky winner gets to choose 3 digis of their choice. How fab is that?
I encourage you to buy this amazing deck. My clients love it. Jennifer and her art students have created something unique and very special. They can be purchased at cost $20.00 as a professional courtesy, tax deductible from JennyHereth@gmail.com or online through http://iartistsinfluence.org/#home for $50.00 tax deductible thru Paypal. 100% of the profits go to teem projects. Shipping is free.
I was feeling mighty proud. As USSA’s point person on Families Afield I spend a significant amount time thinking about getting new hunters involved in our sport and working with state legislators to make that happen. After going home that day feeling good about the success we’ve had and the new hunters we’ve created… I was met by the cold reality that I had missed the trees for the forest. In this case, the tree is my longtime girlfriend.
July 1-10: Vocals. Songs I write with just vocals. No drum beat, so background music, just me (and a bit of pitch changing because I sound like a little girl in recordings).
Knuckle; noun: A part of the finger at a joint where the bone is near the surface; verb: Rub or press (something, especially the eyes) with the knuckles.
‘Cause you’re a troubled man like me,
I am so thankful for Chad and the amazing husband he is to me, and the wonderful father he is to Kaden. Without Chad I am like half of myself. I seriously don't know how I was ever a person before we were married. I know that sounds strange, but I just feel like he is the perfect complement to my personality. He is laid back when I am up tight. He is calm when I am frazzled. I wouldn't want to share life with anyone else, not to mention the huge responsibility of parenthood!
Morel Mushrooms. They grow wild in these parts and finding them is almost as great a reward as eating them. These are the same mushrooms that sell in city grocery stores for over $100 per pound. And they are here - in the wild - for free - just waiting to be found.
I get my shot, pick up the pens and sit down to wait the mandatory twenty minutes before leaving.
The French Leftist media today is full of “I had no idea what a monster he was” bollocks, but the degree of sensory disablement required to miss this side of Dominique Strauss-Kahn’s life would have to have been on a par with the Murdoch family’s inability to grasp endemic phone-hacking at News International. Meanwhile, one is left pondering what the corporation Eiffage hoped to gain by this behaviour. The company issued a statement last night denying all ‘insinuations’, but the link between them and Roquet is a fact: and three hours ago, Le Parisien ran a piece saying that David Roquet had incriminated Eiffage in his testimony to police.
5. Fine Time (Messed Around Mix)
1 t. salt
» 12/10 – Vancouver, BC @ General Motors Place
Today was a work day at my school for the summer enrichment program. I decided to work the four weeks this summer to earn some extra cash for much needed furniture for our house. Our couches and mattress need to be replaced. They are the oldest pieces that we have that are not antiques! Crab t shirt-Sam's
But shopping here is getting harder and harder. The winter ("Ha haa" I say in best Nelson-from-the-Simpsons-style as I weather the 'cold' weather...) is approaching. The things to own right now, at least according to all of the shopkeepers, seem to be big and woolly dark-colored sweaters, black and grey turtlenecks, navy scarves, black leather boots, dark wash denims, black pants, and really any dark things made out of flannel and wool. To be worn on top of other items made out of flannel and wool. Black and grey and navy and dark purple everything. Layered. one layer on top of another, onto infinity, it seems.
Of four recent samples, one has been a bit flabby, but the other three have demonstrated real evidence of having conditioned in the bottle – dense spires of carbonation rising to create a huge, rocky head. That is what you want in a bottle-conditioned beer. And the yeast stays firmly stuck to the bottom, so it’s easy to pour it clear.
If all of the parents of 6.7 million drug users in the Philippines think the same way, the war against drug in the country will not prosper. (Data based on 2004 survey of Dangerous Drugs Board)
Now you're ready to get back in the swing of things at your university/community college/trade school. Remember that school comes first, and to always show up for your classes at least five minutes early to have a brief conversation with your professor. If he refuses to let you retake the midterm, show your hunting knife as well as a few well rehearsed stabbing motions. Be creative, and see how many different shapes and sizes you can draw phalli on your fellow students' faces. And, always pay the minimum payment on your credit card.
I found my items, I think. A couple of these were tough. So, I had to really SSSSTTTTRRREEETTTCCCHHHH a bit. Hope that's okay.
== Example: The "case" for privatizing Social Security ==
No man left behind, and all that.
Is there a way to keep FB from sending things to the hidden posts page for your fans?
Barnes & Noble is among a host of companies that have been targeted by Microsoft for their use of Android. The software company argues that Android violates patents it holds, and has inked a slew of licensing deals with vendors. Barnes & Noble had been one of the few companies attempting to battle it out.
-Sluty and Whitmire pick their Rising Stars teams
The time comes to drink the concoction, a thick syrup with a slight grape flavor that leaves a bitter aftertaste, and the woman asks you to lean the chair back to relax for a bit. She’ll be right back to check in on you while you watch a short video. Relaxing doesn’t come easy for you, although ambience of the room, the vanilla scent, all seem to help. You close your eyes.
Soon things will be alright.
It's hot. (I don't want to think about it.)
The closer Grace gets to Daniel, the more she jeopardizes her life, as her actions stir resentment in Jude and drive him to embrace the ancient evil Daniel unleashed that horrific night. Grace must discover the truth behind the boy’s dark secret…and the cure that can save the ones she loves. But she may have to lay down the ultimate sacrifice to do it–her soul. (description from Goodreads)
Those Darlins
Now, I went a little crazy and didn't include an inspirational saying on this one (GASP). I felt that this picture was inspiration enough on it's own. This picture, to me, says "Greater things lie ahead". This picture makes me feel happy and carefree. What does this picture say that is inspirational to you?????
Now normally when I'm to be spanked i'm very compliant as I'm usually naturally submissive (Hubby says so too).. Not today.
Everything is on repeat at the moment.
The village elder also said that one of the officers was part of the last raiding team that burnt down their houses and should pay “sogit” (compensation) for torching down the 33 houses.
I sourced the wine barrel from Eveshem Wood Vinyard, on a recommendation from Paul that they made excellent Pinot Noirs. However there was a bit of a miscommunication, and we ended up with a used Temperanillo barrel from them instead of a Pinot barrel. I think this will be great though; I wasn't too set on the wine varietal, I just wanted to use a barrel that had aged Oregon-grown grapes. The barrel smelled great when we got it and had already been emptied and treated with sulfur a few weeks beforehand, so all we did was give it a couple of cold-water rinses before filling. The barrel was in excellent condition with not even a tiny leak that needed patching.
"Rhythm of Love" is the first single from Plain White T's' upcoming album "The Wonders of the Younger" which will be released later this year. The song, also written by Tim, is a brightly melodic tune, inspired by a bittersweet romance.
Remembering to Praise him is hard. Really really hard. Well when times are good of course its easy. When times are hard actually I remember I should praise, it is the actual praising that gets hard.
I’m trying to see that. I’m trying to breathe, and pause, and reflect. I’m trying to savor each moment.
Religious faith, on the other hand, erodes compassion. Thoughts like, “this might be all part of God’s plan,” or “there are no accidents in life,” or “everyone on some level gets what he or she deserves” - these ideas are not only stupid, they are extraordinarily callous. They are nothing more than a childish refusal to connect with the suffering of other human beings. It is time to grow up and let our hearts break at moments like this." - Sam Harris
Firstly, we already planned to re-record Red Album because we had done every single thing of Red Album at home by ourselves at that time so it was a lil bit rough.
It’s really fitting that the base of this Kylie Minogue statue is a star, because the ex-“Neighbours” actress has been one of this country’s biggest stars since the Eighties.
List 5 things that make you happy..
Mr. Delingpole is enthusiastically opinionated, delightfully cranky, and thoroughly enjoyable. A man after my own heart. Here he is on Uncommon Knowledge:
I love life.
Which is just how I like it. I appreciate being read at all. That people actually take precious time to read my ramblings is a gift and an honor in itself. But getting comments is a special bonus which I do not take lightly. That readers, by and large, respond to whatever blog topics I've written about, and share their own takes on the matter, is rewarding. I enjoy the back-and-forth in the Comments Section, and I do try to reply to each one - except maybe the Chinese spammers, to whom I can only extend a heartfelt piao xi, xie xie.
It is also my take — again for whatever that’s worth — that ads being run by PACs supporting re-election, along with speeches and appearances by the President, albeit in campaign-mode, are effective with 20-25% of likely voters. Facts in the news and facts in individuals’ lives and families’ lives just keep being 180 degrees out of phase with what comes across the President’s teleprompter and lips.
- The very first country to abolish capital punishment was Austria in 1787.
The next two louseworts to bloom are the Capitate (P. capitata) and the Purple lousewort (P. sudetica). The Capitate Lousewort is yellow and prefers dryer ground and can grow in large patches covering several meters in diameter. The stem is single, growing from a thin rhizome, and the unbranched stem can have up to four flower heads, although one or two are more common. The corolla is yellowish or at times the upper lip can become rose-colored with age. Average height is around 15cm/6 inches.
Bill: I wrote Son of Harpo Speaks! for two reasons. Siblings of Groucho's and Chico had written books about their father, but no one from Harpo's family had done so. I thought it was time to complete the trifecta. Yes, there are new stories about the Marx Brothers never before published, and the close father/son and professional relationship dad and I shared together. But the book has another story that I hope people find very compelling; that of the "too Hollywood to believe" way I came to become a part of Harpo's and Susan's lives. I chose to write about that only after mom's passing in 2002, carefully respecting her lifetime role as my mom, the parent. It is a weird story about rejection, abandonment, adoption, and acceptance that I believe many can relate to and understand the accompanying feelings attached to these issues that can affect a lifetime of one's behavior.
Focusing on the word PASSION this year helps me notice
A man with no country and no flag to salute
when we discover that
This sort of politics is not only ineffective (look at the growing rift), but it seems to me, to be in direct conflict with the AFN's own Charter.
Nothing’s gonna change my world
Oh, he could be charming. Lord knows he was handsome. His body was lean and hard, like a runner’s. Sandy hair, a perpetual tan and a smile made for toothpaste commercials; he knew how to make every woman he met feel like they were the only one in the world when they were in his company.
I probably justify it to myself by saying, it's semi-good for me...because it DOES have a whole grain crust! But...since it's only "semi" good for you...and that will probably be a stretch when you see the other ingredients...it's really not something you want to make every day. Darn it!
I have precious memories of our 63 years together. Without her, I would be a different man, with a different life. She devoted herself to me and our children.
- john lennon - john lennon / plastic ono band - apple records - 1970
pro 3:9 honour the lord with thy substance, and with the firstfruits of all thine increase
Today is one of those slow days - every blade of grass, leaf and living creature pointing towards a cold and long winter. Winter is a time for taking things easy, reflection and for certain bodily organs to take a break. It is a special time in the bush - a change of colors, animals are more visible and concentrated. It is a time for lots of 'reading' ......... books, yourself and all the signs of nature.
1. How long am I willing to sit & wait?
Another good resource is the archives of The New Yorker magazine. With a little patience you can find stories by Frank O'Conner, William Trevor, and Anne Enright. You can even find pod casts of some stories by Irish authors. The Manchester Guardian Pod Cast page also has a few Irish Short Stories online. They have one of Elizabeth Bowen's most highly regarded short stories online as a podcast.
Georges (1843): The protagonist of this novel is a man of mixed race, a rare allusion to Dumas’ own African ancestry.
Working for someone else is trading time for money, but doesn’t build equity. As an entrepreneur, you are the master of your own destiny.
48. Chinese food and DVDs – the perfect mix
The chocolates sell themselves, and I have actually had MANY wonderful helpers who have taken them to school, work, uni and every other place imaginable (including our weekly trivia sessions) to sell them and help me raise money. Thanks to all my lil chocolate elves who have done a fabulous job.
Last weekend I hopped on a bus and headed downtown to meet my mom and sister. We spent the day wandering around one of the most beautiful parts of the city, including a park and a beach! It was the first super sunny day of the year, and it was certainly not wasted. I wore my turquoise scalloped shorts and my trusty blazer, and consumed way too much yummy food. The day reminded me just how much I love the sun, and exploring pretty places on gorgeous days! I can't wait for the Vancouver-ish weather to go away again so we can have some of the beautiful sunshine back!
in the world:
I urged her to take immediate action and, if no Exclusion Order was made, to provide me with full details surrounding the reason for the decision.
And it’s common over there
Videos is THE place to go for awesome little videos of back to school projects (Did you know you can paint with ice?) Be sure to check out their other videos and great back to school tips, too.
The author had suggested a marketing ploy that instead of categorizing it as fiction, it could be semi-autobiographical fiction or even a memoir, and he coud go out on tour and claim all this stuff had happened to him, that he was in this secret mind-control program run by the evil secret black ops military and he was now only regaining his memories and such. He claimed we would make millions, there were would be a big movie deal with Bruce Willis playing him. You have to understand something about the publishing and film world: every week we get a dozen of these sort of pitches, everywhere out of the woodworks people think they have some Big Hit Idea that will make Big Bucks, and “let’s say it is my true story, that will sell it better.”
Cut the artichokes at the base and remove the outside leaves. Cook them in water with the lemon pieces until tender. (I removed the zest and used it in my main course)
If you can’t scan the scene and you can’t read the words, this renders the contact lens HUD effectively useless.
00:00 The Clusters -cool mood
I usually don't write a blog when I'm not in a perfect, fantastic mood with my "A" game on...but guess what??! YOU are about to get a glimpse of what I'm like at my wits end. Cuz guess what?! I'm mad as hell today!
The adventitious is ultimately in the annual of the gameplay, which admirers and newcomers should be able to bound adapted into afterwards abundant fuss. You alpha off with a abandoned Pokémon accompaniment by your side, which serves as your proxy in battle—you adeptness be calling the shots in a fight, but it’s your Pokémon that do all the abundant lifting. As you aberrate through forests, fields of alpine grass, underground caves, and a amaranthine of added locations, you’ll consistently be attacked by agrarian Pokémon, which, if you’re able to abrasion down their bloom afterwards acquisition them entirely, can be captured in a Pokéball, finer taming them and axis them into companions. You can accept up to six Pokémon with you at once, and anniversary of your Pokémon can apprentice up to four altered abilities. These abilities can arise by itself as they acquire acquaintance in battle, or you can advise them new tricks appliance abstruse machines and hidden machines, which can be acceptable in a bulk of altered ways. As they abound stronger, abounding Pokémon can aswell evolve, finer axis them into an in actuality new and added able Pokémon.
WEATHER is an important element in any setting, providing sensory texture and contributing to the mood the writer wishes to create in a scene. With a deft touch, weather can enhance the character's emotional response to a specific location, it can add conflict, and it can also (lightly) foreshadow coming events.
If their point of view can be mainstreamed, there is no reason the Holocaust couldn’t happen in America. The justification these fiends give for killing babies would apply just as readily to the elderly, the disabled, or any other group of people deemed to be inconvenient.
Our booths are by the West Gate...we have the tan tents and the colorful banner....Just like the picture!
Bells Two Hearted
Anyone leaf
“You were in there on your hands and knees up there?!!”
Howard
As I mentioned, we had planned on lining the back wall. However, after seeing Ashli's most recent bookcase project, in which she created a bump out, I knew we had to do the same!
July 30 – Charlotte, NC @ Charlotte Verizon Wireless Ampitheater
(Update: I just watched the Phoenix Coyotes shutout the Chicago Blackhawks4-0 in Game Six of their series to eliminate Chicago. Mike Smith is not a better goaltender than Marc-Andre Fleury, and the Coyotes’ defensive corps is not superior to the Penguins. However, the Coyotes won the elmination game despite being outshot 39-20, and with the Blackhawks dominating play in Phoenix’ zone. How did the Coyotes win?
Three weeks ago today, the world lost an amazing woman - my Auntie - after a several year long battle with cancer. It was absolutely heartbreaking and gut wrenching to see her in so much pain in the last several years, and excruciatingly sad to lose her. She was much beloved by all us, and touched so many lives as a sister, aunt, friend, teacher ... she is truly missed.
Too much work for me. Really. I was honestly confused at the best way to utilize the filing part, do I file coupons by product name? Or by type of product? I was doing both and inconsistently. On top of that, I began stuffing all my coupons for the current shopping trip into the front of the envelope, and then at the store, was left digging through all of the other slots trying to find something because I knew I had a coupon for something I just found on sale. And then, I decided the envelope just wasn't working for me so I started using a regular legal sized envelope. Which didn't hold up past two shopping trips before it looked like it had been run over by a shopping cart twenty six times. Then I started tossing them into a large ziploc bag. Really? Another totally awful solution.
Recently I pulled out this sketchbook hoping for some inspiration for a new piece of jewelry. I found a drawing of a floral decoration from the Accademia Museum in Venice. I didn't note what it was, but I think it was probably a decorative element on an altarpiece frame. Here's the sketchbook page, and the flower I wanted to use is in the lower left.
Finn and Rachel decide that they need to get married right after Regionals, before Karofsky showed them life was too short. They thought moving up their wedding date would perk everyone right up but instead it sent their parents into a tizzy. And the one girl who was actually adamant that Finchel should not even think of getting hitched changed her mind – apparently getting back on the Cheerios has given Quinn another perspective on life, one that seems to think Finn makes Rachel happy. Hiram Berry is just about to fake a seizure to end this farcical charade when the giant cliffhanger happens.
Meanwhile the FC is moving us along slowly, both to keep us together and let stragglers catch up and because he is on the intel coms trying to find out what is ahead of us and what the real plan is and if it has changed from what he started out doing.
Looking for something cultural to do this weekend?
The business needs mavericks, it needs street-savvy people, street fighters. It needs people who haven't had exactly the same background as the next guy. It needs people who aren't just pleasant, white, middle-class from a comfortable background. It needs people who did ten weird jobs before they started in advertising. It needs people who start out in the business in their thirties, their forties, or later. It needs people with different life experiences. The business needs to realise this quick, before it gets too stale.
A “perfect storm” of economic and regulatory factors is driving major United States utilities to rapidly switch from coal to natural gas as an electric power source, the top executive of one of the nation’s largest utilities said on Thursday.
The text instructions that follow have been formatted in an attempt to mmake the
"Many skeptics have long memories, recalling past instances when government claimed to know best for the people of Charlestown: busing, urban renewal, construction of the towering, and lead-painted Tobin Bridge."
35 B-15 On Trial: From Adam & Eve to O. J. Simpson (Lanham, Maryland: Lexington Books, 2004) ( with a Foreword by Abner J. Mikva), pp I-xx, 1-499. Sources: Items C-1991(4), D-V/16/1981, D-III/3/1989, D-II/13/1982, D-XII/6/1975, D-XII/8/1979, D-III/26/1991, D-X/28/1984, D-V/9/1982, D-X/3/1964, D-III/4/1979, D-V/11/1977, C-1997 (11) ,D-IV/4/2001, D-XI/19/1976, D-IV/1/1976, D-II/3/1977, D-X/3/1983, D-III/6(B)/1975, D-III/13/1987, D-IV/5/1991, C-1979(8), D-I/31/1990, D-IV/7/1989, C-1974(11), D-XI/21/1995, C-1973 (8), D-XI/4/1987, D-IV/16(A)/2001, D-II/14/2001, and D-II/5/2003, below.)
Palmina Delli Gatti, 33, New York, N.Y.
"I'm trying!" I grunted as she started running next to me. She pulled ahead to give me something to chase.
NYLA FOUND: OMW hears out of South Marginal that an apparently well-liked former presence on WJW's "Fox 8 News in the Morning" has a broadcast home.
In good news, my friend Mel & my bib numbers are only 50 spots apart, so we are definitely in the same starting chute! Unfortunately Rishel and Kelsey have much larger #s, but we’ll all see eachother at the start either way.
Life has been hectic, what with getting my life together for school (which starts in just over two weeks) and planning a last minute vacation.
Meanwhile, Emmy realizes that she is going to need a fresh horse and as she dismounts to walk the horse for awhile, she suddenly falls into a covered pit.
Only then will true Autism Acceptance be achieved and that is what we truly need, not mere awareness, which for some, only highlights us as targets.
Narrator Yes, I know it’s surprisingly roomy inside that shed…
Duck! There’s an incoming kite
Are they looking for the next American Idol?
Tap the egg lightly with a spoon to crack some of the shell.
While I don't make many casserole style meals, this is one that the entire family loves. Red chile or green chile, chicken or beef, cheesy or packed full of vegetables, the possibilities are endless. Packed full of spicy heat or mild enough for everyone, enchiladas are the most versatile food I make.
the big baboon by the light of the moon
One of their online tutorials begins with a quote from Ansel Adams that essentially says, “Great photographs are not taken. They are made.”
“A federal law enforcement official described the plot as ‘aspirational’ — meaning that the suspects wanted to do something but had no weapons or explosives — and described the operation as a sting with a cooperator within the group.” NYT added.
“The current joke is that the only buildings to remain unscathed by the onslaught may be Vidhana Soudha, the building that houses the legislature, and UB City, a complex that is a hideous combination of the Empire State Building and Internet kitsch, built by a liquor baron….
Not only spending quality time together makes a trip like this meaningful, but when you hear your children say that God's creation is amazing; or when you and your mom turn to each other after looking at the dinosaur exhibit and exclaim that nothing so awesome could have been made by chance; that is what also makes it truly meaningful.
This just reminds me of the tagline from this book: “What If God Designed Marriage to Make Us Holy More Than to Make Us Happy?” Maybe if we strive to be more Holy and serve God through out marriages we will be more happy. Hmmm…
Oh. So. Two perfectly nice ordinary groups of Americans, mostly friendly and pleasant enough, are named as Enemies of Civilisation. The Enemy Within. We don’t have the Commie threat any more (many of those damn commies were homosexuals) so Newt has to make do with homosexuals and pagans. Oops, don’t forget Muslims:
needs a little LOVE.
Then try Southwark from Tower Bridge, the walk along the Thames through to Waterloo. You’ve got the cathedral, the Globe, London Bridge and brilliant views of St. Paul’s. I’d do that at night when the city’s lit up.
No one wants to buy unregistered land because of the time and costs involved in verifying ownership.
By this time tomorrow, I'll be floating somewhere over the Pacific Ocean, heading toward Mexico. Blue skies, warm sun, turquoise seas and a handsome man holding my hand.
In case you were wondering, I do read some books written for adults too -- mysteries, chick lit, The Night Circus, cookbooks, nonfiction about health and food, and now, books that I can get on my Kindle (it hasn't replaced what I read in paper, just provided another way for me to find books to read).
Dr. Breaker is Chair of the Department of Molecular, Cellular and Developmental Biology at Yale University where he holds a Henry Ford II Professorship.
Which turned into a grin, and then a loud gafawf…….and then hilarious laughter as he was trying to utter ..”WTF?!”
“BEST INDIE DANCE PARTY” – TIMEOUT NEW YORK
I tried the outfit again a couple of days later with a high necked black top and it was MUCH better - however I forgot to get a pic to show you!!!
Inverness Sheriff Court heard how he was spotted raiding nests in a bird colony on the island.
Ally thinks her luck is finally changing when she meets Robyn Dillon. Robyn was in a severe rear-end automobile accident and has been diagnosed with trigeminal neuralgia. Although Ally has never heard of this condition, she learns from her client’s doctors that the condition causes the worst pain known to man.
By the time they graduate, students’ self-centered attentions and energies should be applied outward and forward, to a sense of social responsibility for the collective and common weal, an understanding of the democratic experiment — engagement with their society, their Zeitgeist – because it will be theirs to inhabit, survive, and ameliorate.
The Conclusion
¾ tsp. sea salt
they shed
My third oldest will be graduating from high school in 2012. She is currently working at McDonald's as a crew trainer.
That’s when Lin burst onto the scene, playing exceptionally well for an exceptionally disappointing New York Knicks team, and making the city of New York excited about something for once. (You know… aside from the perpetual contention of the Yankees, and the new Super Bowl champion Giants).
NELP recommends two related regulatory fixes. No Congressional action required — thank heavens! There is, however, a bill pending in Congress that would force the Labor Department to act.
consultations take place every year in the Health Board area. 88,000 calls were made to the GP our of hours service, 60% of these were made over the weekend?
To a friend: your heart;
Director- Jonathan Lee
So for me it’s pretty easy to choose to be positive – I can chosen to believe that this baby inside me will live a long and happy life after I have carried it. Making that choice after loss must be almost impossible? Even though I do get worried and have even felt that it’s unfair that I’m pregnant again, with no issues getting pregnant and, so far, regular pregnancies.
But is it a price you will personally be paying, Mr Narey? I somehow doubt it.
When it's done, transfer the meatloaf to a heated platter and let it rest for about 5 minutes before slicing it. Since it's usually just the Hubbs and me for dinner, I'll just throw in a couple of baked potatoes along with it, or if I'm in the mood, I'll make mashed/smashed or twice baked. This time, I made oven roasted herbed potatoes (recipe to follow) because they just happen to be someone's favorites. Can you guess who? LOL Serve it with your favorite sides and enjoy!
Happy Labor Day
the list goes on ...
All too often everyone is so caught up in just getting to where they need to be, staying inside and watching their favorite TV show, and ignoring the beauty that surrounds them. Too many people see a snow storm as annoying and cold, and as a way to slow down their commute. Yet with a savoring attitude, it doesn't have to be that way.
Row 2: Cast on 1 stitch, knit to the end of the row. (6 stitches)
His life is a joke that the whole world is in on
“Home sweet home. This is the place to find happiness. If one doesn’t find it here, one doesn’t find it anywhere.” M. K. Soni
Your children are slaves for foreigners to exploit.
548 ***D-X/3/1964. “Family and City: On Sophocles’ Antigone.” Basic Program Staff Seminar, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1991(4), pp. 846-49, 1047-48, and in Item B-15 (Projected), above, pp. 97-100, 108-10 (2004.)
Another year over. Twelve little people all ready to go to Big School.
Anniversary Song and NotesIn comments to our Anniversary post, Sandee left us the anniversary song. She included cute little notes so I asked her how she did that and here's what she sent me: & # 9834 ; Now take out all the spaces and you have a note. I will try it: ♪ Yup, it works!
One thing I did learn is that a Home Office briefing on the proposed new bill is floating about on the internet - it is here on the DeHavilland site, for instance - but we were assured that things have moved on since it was written
It was a great day and I want to thank Mike and Erica for letting me ride along
Combine all ingredients and whisk together until well-combined.
Thanks for stopping by today xxx
Although I think this was a holiday created by the greeting card companies in association with florists everywhere, it’s good to remember how much our mothers mean to us. Our personalities were formed under her auspices as we grew up. She was our first supporter and encouraged us as we headed into the future. She was the true person we could turn to if we were in trouble. Is there anyone more important than a mother.
However, a telling sign all was not well was my frequent sense of distraction. The telling caught my attention more than the tale. Clive! Elsa! I wanted to giggle in delight. (Colin Clive and Elsa Lanchester were actors in the Universal Horrors.) I was amused by their penchant for “high-sucrose foodstuffs”, the poster over their bed, and the fact that Dren had four fingers. I enjoyed puzzling out Brody’s novelty shirts.
Supplement 1: Resume (1 page maximum, submit as PDF file)
Sara rendered to perfection the popular film song Bole Chudiyaan, in her sweet voice, and everybody showered praises on her. Her singing improved a lot in the course of the competition, but she still became a victim of public voting. Her melancholic and innocent voice and modest attire made her stand out among the participant.
So we have to make a choice and we need to choose carefully who we follow because everything in time and eternity is at stake.
Missing skills leads to anxiety.
WRONG.
Consider this as the beginning of the USSR here. “Papers please,” with strip search. Our government shredding whatever remaining visages of the Constitution remain.
Today, Machu Picchu sits in a 325 square km Historical Sanctuary which not only protects the city, but also helps protect the areas rich flora and fauna. In 1983, UNESCO designated Machu Picchua World Heritage Site and in 2007, a worldwide internet poll voted Machu Picchu as one of the New Seven Wonders of the World. During our visit, we saw many workers performing maintenance and restoration work, including removing plant growth from between stone work, repairing mortar, and (along with several llama) trimming grass. Machu Picchu is the largest tourist attraction inPeru and concerns have risen over the impact of so many visitors to this ancient site. The government has set restrictions on development in the area and just last year started restricting the number of daily visitors. There have been attempts to construct a helipad in the area but the Peruvian government has yet to approve such a plan. In fact, there is a no-fly-zone over the site.
luckily
in honor of her special day i created this very special card for her....
Ireland would save the world from much misery by defaulting now and driving the vampire banks into liquidation.
Hubby: What insurance policy?
People carried an effigy of the RCD ruling party members, in the form of a coffin, through the crowd.
In the past, someone (usually my Mom) had to accompany me when I took any new route for the first time that was the slightest bit complicated. If she did not accompany me, she had to take my printouts of maps and draw on landmarks and detailed instructions along with many verbal prompts.
Angelo barked, or rather tried to bark. It’s not easy when you’ve got a big bone shoved in your mouth.
Vessel. We just got these at our local health food store with the plan of using them for smoothies. They are cheaper at the store if we have our own Vessel, although I use mine for homemade smoothies too. I have started using mine for water though, and I am amazed at how much more water I'm drinking. Increasing water consumption never hurt anyone, especially a nursing mom who will go a whole day on 8oz of hot tea and a few sips of water. Yeah, I needed to work on my fluid intake. Well Mr. Vessel, hats off to you for helping me accomplish that. Also BPA free. This source link is directly to the Vessel store.
5/22 – Washington, DC @ Rock and Roll Hotel
There was an awkward silence. I presumed I had won.
6.Unschooled kids sometimes
Wachovia Arena
It was just a thought.
At a time of extreme racial tensions and as one of the few black plebes, Graves was the object of many hazing, harassments, and racial slurs inside the ranks. His experiences during this time later were featured in several books and articles authored by official U.S. Navy historian Robert Schneller.
First of all: What is fat burning?
Means: "Please don't try on one more outfit, I'm starving."
To add some form of continuity within the show I will occasionally feature an artist who has a lot of cover versions in their back catalogue. This week it is Tom Jones who throughout his long career has consistently included cover versions on most of his albums. Recently he has had resurgence in England playing with bands like Portishead, Robbie Williams, Jools Holland and the Cardigans.
muttering about dissenters in our midst..
Only a skilled writer and researcher could pen so many pages that enthrall readers. With information from hundreds of sources, Craig Shirley relates events of the six days before and the three weeks following Japan’s unexpected bombing of Pearl Harbor.
What in the world? I wondered, looking at her.
"Uhhh!" And just like that, Pedro whipped off his shirt and showed me the coiled cobra that adorned the full-length of his back. Now, I'm not really into snakes or tattoos but I knew when something needed to be said to acknowledge such a fine piece of work. "Cool beans!" is all I could muster.
It took me a while, but I finally realized that the only thing that was truly holding me back from doing what I loved was fear of failure.
I was sitting in my daughter’s violin class this morning when I noticed the teacher’s sockless ankle in her Converse sneaker. She’s not young and there were some varicose veins. This was real life, but for some reason I thought, I have never seen a shot like that in a film. It wasn’t the most pleasant image, but it wasn’t as gross as it sounds. My point is that you could probably follow those varicose veins up to a very interesting story.
This year's field was made up of 68 competitors from 11 states and three countries. The vast majority of the candidates were from Indiana - this is Hoosier Beer Geek, after all - but we feel confident that the beers receiving votes are as good as any beers you'll find anywhere.
Discussant:Irene Small, University of Ilinois, Urbana-Champaign
As I have mentioned, Romney will be the GOP nominee. He has money. He has flaws. But he has less flaws than Newt and more electibility than Santorum. Ron, my guy, of course has passionate followers. They understand what is at stake in this election. Unfortunately, Dr. Paul hasn’t had a chance to take off. The message of liberty continues to be spread by him and his campaign, through conduits like myself, but I think the GOP establishment has already made up their mind. The majority of GOP sheep are toeing the party line. They don’t care that Romney is the least inspiring and weakest nominee winner in history. Nobody loves this guy. His base isn’t energized. His platform centers on the fact that he was a successful businessman and therefore he knows how to run a business when this country so desperately needs these skills. Unfortunately, Mittens should have taken the fork out a long time ago. This sucker is done.
Aaron Ramsey was bought from Cardiff City when he was still at the ‘milk’ age of 18. He was slowly introduced to the squad by AW because there were many players that were in front of him. He got his first goal for the club in his Champions League debut against Fenerbahce. That match will also be remembered by the legendary debut own goal scored by Mikael Silvestre. Pascal Cygan did it before him and Sebastien Squillaci did it after him. In the 2009/10 campaign, AW adopted a new 4-2-3-1 formation that created more room for the midfielders present in the squad. Just like the way Nigeria has a shitload of strikers; Arsenal has a large stock of footballers playing predominantly in the midfield.
Grade: B. She’s Ange-loony!
Yep, you heard me correctly...none other than the ghetto capital of our OWN frigging nation...
Do you have a vision? Are you passionate about it? When was the last time you thought about it? Is what you see in your future the place you really want to take your life?
Bubble baths- I get so relaxed in the tub, I need my bubble baths.
Good to see the fantastic glasses keep coming with every new collection.
Damnation Alley is a post-apocalyptic thriller loosely based on a short story and novel by science fiction writer Roger Zelazny. Zelazny learned the hard way that Hollywood is not big on being faithful to source material, though rumors he demanded his name be taken off the film are not true. Nevertheless, stories of post-apocalyptic survival have been done far better. Not to mention with a budget much large than the $23.35 with which this one was obviously made.
Barbara Baird is Associate Professor and head of women’s studies at Flinders University in South Australia. She has researched the history and contemporary cultural politics of abortion, and changing discourses of sexuality in Australia.
and being so short
“Love gives itself; it is not bought.” (Henry Wadsworth Longfellow)
It wasn’t like I was looking for any sort of extra excitement in a Publix, on a weeknight, at the intersection of Grown-up Country Lane and New Suburbia Avenue. I’m there for ‘puppy pads’ (though they’re hardly puppies any more), and something else I was trying not to forget then and can’t remember now…
How insulting is it to find that the same Italian espresso maker is cheaper in France than in its native Italy?
Disbursing of funds should be carried out in all sincerity without imposing conditions or using strong arm tactics.
It occurred to me that walking aids aren't for when one no longer can walk at all, but rather to make it easier to walk and less tiring. Ken was right, time for a wheelchair. We didn't buy one, because we need more information before we make that huge purchase. We are renting one for 2 months. After we got it, we went to Omega in Downers Grove for lunch, picked up Bella and then Ken wheeled us through the park by our house. It was a beautiful day.
Anxious to undress, these dangerous dolls ply their womanly wares to get whatever they want: men, power and sex - lots of sex. Yet to quench their fiery desires they crave more, much more. See, even sultry sinners long for love. Bad Girls Need Love Too is a frolicking celebration of pulp fiction floozies doomed to keep looking for love in all the wrong places. Thankfully, repeating the same mistake over and over again has never been more fun, or outrageous.
That’s quite a drop, and the weird part is how the values flipped:
If we can impose a two-party system the police apparatus cannot again be used to drag down our elected governments, and deny us our democratic rights.
So, recipe in hand, ingredients out
And after the store closes, you might as well stick around as right next door – at Head on the Door - BPM will be playing with special guests Denzy and the Denzophonix, who I have heard nothing but glowing reviews for since their performance last week at the Looking Up Records debut party.
Maybe I need a few people to remind me about this from time to time.
Mirakhur RK, Badve AV. Pregnancy and anaesthetic practice in India. Anaesthesia 1975; 30: 18-22.
A boss who suspected a worker of theft decided to make an example of him - and throw political correctness out of the window at the same time.
of Mennonites"
They were very tasty! Nice and rustic and chewy, probably due to having twice as much brown sugar as white. I was stymied by the lack of vanilla in this recipe, since I always think it's such an important component in baking. Since I usually weigh my ingredients, working with weights in this recipe didn't faze me, but I'm accustomed to ounces, not grams. Out of curiosity, I measured in grams, then translated the measurements into ounces (no fancy math - I used the g/oz button on my kitchen scale). Not surprisingly, the amounts are pretty standard, and I'll share them below. The recipe is actually pretty similar to the Cook's Illustrated Thick and Chewy Cookies - my old go-to recipe: both have an egg and an egg yolk; the sugar measurements are the same; and both call for melting and slightly cooling the butter.
Using an applicator, I added some pink to her cheeks, a little bit of tan to her skin and some yellow highlights in her hair. For detailed chalking, I like to use an applicator and blend with a cotton ball if needed.
With New Years resolution season in full swing now, the vast and overwhelming amount of tips and motivational “pats on the back” can be daunting to anyone trying to get back into the swing of leading a healthy life.
This Mediterranean/Moroccan retreat was built in the 1920’s as an artists studio
Article 14 of the E-Commerce Directive states that the provider of an ‘information society service’ that consists of the storage of information provided by a user of the service is not liable for illegal information, so long as the provider didn’t authorize, control or know about the information and removes it promptly when alerted to it. An ‘information society service’ is defined as any service normally provided for remuneration, at a distance, by electronic means and at the individual request of a recipient of the service.
The National Statistics Institute, INE, has calculated that half a million people have left Spain this year, of whom more than 50,000 are Spaniards. Meanwhile the number of immigrants to arrive in 2008 and 2009 was down by more than 50%. The general sub-director of the INE considers that the exodus will continue until 2020.
And the guy who is just hilarious enough to do this to his arms. Permanently. For life.
Autumn is on the way , soon the parks will be full of dried up leaves, the tree in front will be bare but strikingly beautiful in that bareness and the tree in back will be naked and we can see the birds better.
I've been thinking about this blog and where it should go from here.
that every generation fears that people (usually young people) are debasing and
I think I'm going back to counting my calories this week. I want to be back in the 179 area again...or lower!
And played and played and played.
In previous Events, I have described the Heart Chakra as a multi-faceted Heart-shaped Emerald. This image came to me from Spirit about two years ago, but even before I ever heard of Holly Troy’s “Writing the Energetic Body” Courses, it became clear to me that the Heart Chakra is the attractor and the radiator of Divine Love.
So last night, house quiet as the rest of the family was off, I sat down at my desk and worked. It wasn't completely interruption free. I'd still pop on the 'net or TweetDeck from time to time. It's a practice that I need to get out of as well. I used to shut off the 'net on my computer and work for several hours without interruption. While I only worked on revisions for a work-in-progress last night, it was still work. More than I did in the entire month of April.
There seems to be no escaping the mention of exam results. As an average seventeen year old, I have found anybody at least 10 years older than you is going to ask you about how your exams went, mostly because they find it difficult to relate to young people of today and decide to opt for the easy subject of exams, a subject that is one of pain and frustration. All you can do is pull a grimace, stutter out an “eeeeeeer” and pray for the subject to pass, for fear of tempting fate if you say “Oh, I think they went okay…” only to find that the letter that pops through your door some months later proclaims you’ve failed everything and your life is over. Even when with your friends, there is always going to be one irritating little prick who’s claps his hands together with glee, smiles and says; “only 3 days to go guys!”. In response to this statement, this guy gets a cold evil stare left right and center, because really everybody knows that this annoying prick is going to get straight A’s, get a job as a Doctor or a Lawyer, go on holidays to Barbados with his wife who some what resembles Victoria Beckham and never look back.
It's worth noting the document I have access to is a review copy only, so specific details of content and layout may change prior to release, which is due in around a week.
By virtue of what I do for money I have found myself a little more involved with historic preservation, and, sickeningly enough, local politics than I anticipated. There's a joke around where I live, you end up serving as Lord Mayor or on the Board of Trusties by virtue of eventually it becomes your turn. Anytime this has been brought up around me I tend to snarl.
Conserve water by using the campground’s restroom and showers.
hallmarks of this Task Force.
Fifth round. Clear. No bubbles. Sticky.
So aprox a 35.00 value (again, assuming the missing cleansing cloths arrive). If the cleansing cloths never arrive a 17.00 value. That's if I don't use the free lip shine card!
10. The Turquoise Swimming Pools - Burst Balloons
For what else can be taken?
OK… as @infobunny tweeted it – it is her leg! I am always discreet….. and did not wish to reveal the owner of the LEG!
Bookstore Advantage - $2799
Sure, his eyes were shot out, and he burnt to death, but Micheal is actually alive. He escapes during transportation, and heads back to Haddenfield to finish what he started. Only to find his sister dead, and her daughter is the last of the Myers bloodline.
But those parts of us are as much of what we are to and with each other as the rest of them. It's just that they need to be kept constrained. Like the beast in a way. Ironic, no? But I completely agree. For so many reasons, it would never work.
Blanket: You should already have plenty of these waiting downstairs to cover up with but make sure you put some inside of an airtight container (or tote like I did) that way you have a dry one to use.
The only thing I know for certain about this next baby and that is the same as it was with Makenzie- I will never ever leave. I will never turn my back. I pray I have learned from what Makenzie has taught me. I pray I do better this time. I pray this child understands who they are and the kind of love I already have for them.
The original crew members were ecstatic, their children less so. They were space-born and space-borne, explorers of the infinite; crèche-rearing and planet-bound life seemed terribly confining. They wanted more. They were reluctant to return to the Barsoom of their parents' birth; it was not their home.
In case you didn’t know about the memorial service until finally right after it absolutely was above, you’ll be able to however convey your ex and also admiration. Close relatives need to have your ideas, desires, and words and phrases even after the particular funeral service is over. Flowers and other gestures really are a sore in addition to allow approach to make them aware actually not alone. After all, among the best ways to respect all those who have handed down would be to support those they’ve got left behind.
Yesterday was filled with many emotions.
We did manage to ask questions, shake hands, and sign up on the contact list, but we left with a lot more than brochures. We left with a goal in mind. We left with a direction. And it’s one that has guided many of the decisions we’ve made for our lives since.
So onto the challenge:
Tofu, 1 block
I am now convinced that the industry cannot count on helpful, pro-active, useful, timely guidance from DDMAC. If I’m not mistaken, FDA never even came out with guidance about the web 1.0 Internet. And now our digitally-networked world is evolving even faster (ironically, FDA is making pretty good use of social media tools – for themselves). Social media does not move at a glacial pace – it’s a sprint. Whatever comes out of this mill in 10 years or so will be about as helpful as guidance about the proper use of a FAX machine.
Thanks for visiting with me! You make my day! :-)
This element, which has a soft s-curve, contains the master bedroom and its ancillary spaces are separated from the living room double volume by a set of walnut shutters. “The building provides a volumetrically dramatic and dynamic interior space on a grand scale. The objective of the interior décor was to create a softer and intimate counterpoint whilst not jeopardising the clean, geometric lines of the architecture.
Communism has this same idea – only now without God. If you examine it, it is actually a chiliastic idea – that Paradise is coming to earth, just ahead of us. It is very interesting to read about the beginning of the Communist movement in the 19th century, because the writings of its early “prophets,” such as Fourier in France, are absolutely fantastic nonsense. Fourier talks about the coming age of world peace and prosperity, when all the fountains will be overflowing with pink lemonade, and we will pick meat chops from trees, and all kinds of fantastic things.
People are friendly, however. The Sunday bus, seeing us waiting helplessly in rain, made an unscheduled stop to pick us up. ‘No buses from here go to Manhattan no more,’ the driver told us, as he dropped us in Williamsburg, ‘but the J Train rides every few minutes.’
So I am posting this photo today, after having a little play around, it is unfortunately ‘too interesting’ an object to be a part of my assignment, so for now I will have to pop it away and focus on something more ‘boring’. Fortunately the playing around isn’t in vain, I learnt things from it and I will be able to apply these later on, plus I got a cool image.
Even if you get through to the interview stage, the moment an employer looks at a disabled potential employee and imagines that they may need to fund access changes, specialist seating, telecoms, whatever they might need to actually do the job, the potential for the disabled person to be surreptitiously dumped as ‘too costly’ raises its ugly head. Extra costs are actually minimal in most cases and the DWP’s Access to Work scheme was designed to take care of the non-minimal cases, funding a range of equipment and services for employer (seats, telecoms, access changes etc.), or employee (P.A.s, taxis etc.). AtW was unique, it was a benefit that actually turned a profit for the government, with the Treasury receiving about £1.48 in income tax etc. for every pound AtW spent. Before the election there was even talk of tweaking how AtW worked so that someone like me could arrive for interview at a potential employer and tell them that a package of extra support to cover little stuff like only being able to work while lying flat was already arranged. So of course when the Coalition took power, with their absolute focus on pushing as many disabled people as possible back into the workforce, they promptly slashed AtW’s budget and the range of items covered, leading to a marked drop in the number of people being helped and meaning that many disabled people will now present potential employers with a distinct capital cost for selecting them over a non-disabled candidate. Thanks, IDS!
You guys tell me. When you finish a rough draft, what do you do? And how long do you wait before you delve back into it?
They had a blast. I had a blast.
According to Enrico Pieranunzi discography, compiled by Maurizio Franco and published in the Musica Jazz magazine, this is the first LP recorded by the roman pianist as a leader.
***Word of Caution***
Today, the Far East is an attractive and exotic destination for holiday makers. A multitude of different races seem to exist, apparently in mutual tolerance of each others ideologies. A common cultural feature is the dominance of Dharmic religions such as Buddhism, Hinduism, Zoroastrianism, and Sikhism. Modern Asian territories and regions conventionally included under the term ‘Far East’ are China, Japan, Mongolia, Korea, Brunei, Cambodia, Indonesia, Laos, Malaysia, Philippines, Singapore, Thailand, Vietnam, and also Eastern Russia.
17:30 Close
That aren't always sound but other
Using a whisk, or mixer on a low setting, blend in all the wet ingredients into the dry ingredients. Mix until well-blended.
Close the bowl with a lid and chill in the refrigerator for at least 2 hours.
Odds: the longer I live, the more people I love, the more pain I will see.
You know, I never really miss having a normal TV until I am sick. It would be fun to flip through the channels and watch the commercials. I haven't watched a commercial in several years, minus whatever I see on youtube.
Is Gulen really a benign old Muslim gentleman who retired to the Pocono Mountains from his native Turkey for reasons of health?
One of the first things my Sifu told me is that when you step onto the mat, you leave everything else off.
Portland Tap Room
In my view, the answer is more "no" than "yes". Just as with India, when one speaks of China, "context, nuance and focus are central; generalizations are often misguided at best, misleading at worst". Fakery may be on the decline in some facets of Chinese life but it is alive and flourishing in others. It also depends on what part of "China" one focuses on. First, the evidence marshalled by the article in support of the tagline that counterfeits and fakes are on the decline in China:
WHITE PASS RUSH TIP: STORM THE FACTORY METHOD#2
I didn't have a lot of time to play today, but I did play with an old doll I sculpted, but didn't like at all. (I keep them around to experiment on though!)
Secretly I wondered if this had been a 'long stand' moment.
Pictures… my favorite! I’m just so good at uploading them!
LAHORE – The Lahore High Court on Monday adjourned till Feb 27 hearing of a petition of Geo Super TV Group seeking court directions to hold a re-bidding for sub-licencing of broadcasting rights for ICC cricket during 2012-15.
Something's different. I don't know what it is. Maybe it's me. Maybe it's everyone. Maybe something's changed in how I see the world. I can't put a finger on it, but I just can't seem to shake this feeling of melancholy. I feel...lost.
First off, any peripheral study of history will show that we, especially Americans, live at a time of unprecedented peace. At other points in human history, villages were routinely pillaged, we were constantly at war on our own soil, and the process of simply feeding ourselves meant hunting, putting the participants into extreme mortal danger. Civilian militias were a continual threat, capital punishments were medieval, and the medical profession routinely enacted amputation and bloodletting with no anesthesia. The settlement of white people in America was established by the near complete eradication of the indigenous people through traditional warfare and biological warfare in the form of smallpox, and our country was founded in bloody revolution.
But you should've been in my shoes yesterday"
Hey, I know what your first question is going to be, “But David, you can’t sell someone else’s soul to the Prince of Darkness.” Silly commie liberal, you don’t understand the business concept of “leverage” or other modern investment strategies like those used by Bain Capital.
Some boat owners go overboard (pardon the pun) when it comes to cleaning their boats. They seem to spend more time scrubbing and polishing their vessels than actually cruising or fishing in them. While keeping a craft clean is definitely an important aspect of boat ownership, it’s not necessary to spend long, backbreaking hours to keep your boat looking like new. You simply have to equip yourself with the right tools/products and clean your boat regularly and efficiently. While a little bit of “elbow grease” never hurts, the key is to clean your boat “smarter” not “harder.” This means developing an effective cleaning routine, and making this ritual a habit after each trip. The following pointers will help preserve your boat’s good looks and protect your valuable recreational asset from the unforgiving marine environment.
1/2 bunch green onions chopped
1/4 cup coconut oil
Al-Qaeda propagandist and extremist cleric Anwar Al-Awlaki, for instance, recently said that change will allow terrorist organizations to make a “major leap forward,” regardless of the end-state of the new political system that will replace outgoing dictators.
Why am I always running late?
*2 teaspoons grated ginger
The first thing that struck me when I read this excerpt from John’s gospel was the willingness of people to follow Jesus. But as I read over these few verses a few times, Nathanael’s words kept jumping out at me. “Nazareth! Can anything good come from there?”
When you start your plan, you will have to change the way that you look at money, too. This might sound simplistic, but if your current plan were working you wouldn’t be considering something new. This comes back to being able to commit to change. In this case, change is good because it is taking you from what you are used to, and moves you into the direction of where you actually want to go and not where you are being forced to go based on current decisions.
The Broncemar Beach resort is a complex of apartments and inside the resort they have a supermarket, laundry service, buffet restaurant, a pool bar with an a la carte menu, 2 swimming pools, 2 Jacuzzis and a children's pool. We stayed on an all inclusive basis which was great for us. The food was reasonably good with something different offered every lunch and evening time. Breakfast was the same every day, offering hot and cold options, and Wee Z enjoyed one of my favourite childhood foods from living in Mexico - churros dipped in hot chocolate. The hotel was only 5 minutes from the beach and 2 minutes from the town centre which had plenty of shops and restaurants.
A reading from ‘The Earlier Rule’, of Saint Francis.
I haven't been on here much lately. I've been immersing myself into the holidays and have tried to take a breather for a few weeks. A lot has happened, nothing bad and nothing miraculous, but a lot of just regular life stuff I suppose. I'm not promising to race right back, but I don't think I'm going away forever. Just need a bit longer to figure some stuff out.
I have started a new job this past week. I am the Uptown Theater's new Theater Coordinator. I really love this title. I am no longer a Marketing and Operations Manager (which I will be a little honest here and say I miss). I miss being the know-it-all marketing wiz, but I also love the challenges of my new job. I will post this at a later time. I also love that I have skills that I can apply to this new job, and they are excited about those opportunities.
In the news : My book cover for “Tales of Lust, Hate and Despair” should be ready pretty damn soon (right, Oli?) I’ll keep you posted on that.
So, stockinette it is. The best I can say about these socks? They're finished and they count. ;-)
- I say: How did the little kid learn to shoot so accurately without blowing his dad’s ear off. “Sorry dad, there goes your ear, let me try again”.
And I bet Fred and Barney ate it once,out of necessity, before they thought up the only true innovation,fire and the cooking pot,that opened the recipe floodgates and set us on the journey which elevated us from other mammals.
Until their dying breath.
Wedges- Seychelles Amazon
Wellin Votara sat slumped in the corner of an Imperial holding cell, hands on his head, wondering if he would ever see the light of day again. Surrendering had seemed like a good idea when the alternative was certain death, but now Votara thought he was probably going to die anyway. He had no idea how long he had been in this cell. He thought maybe it had been about two days. He was alone. He had no idea where his squadmates had been taken. He had been thrown in a cell, and had not had any contact with any human being since. No food. No water. Excrement and urine were piled in a corner, as he had not even been provided with a pot to relieve himself in. He was convinced that they had forgotten about him.
1. Cut the potatoes into chunks (or peel ‘em first. I don’t do this I prefer to just wash them and cut them right away)
Mike Wilhelm - guitar & vocals
Psalm 85: 8-9 (the Message)
Some nights I fight this. Perhaps I’m close to the end of the book, perhaps I’ve decided that I’m not tired (though my mind and body would both disagree with the assertion). Either way, I will fight it and fight it and fight it until finally finishing the page and then go to sleep.
Disregarding the need for impact assessments and mitigation plan can sharply increase the risk of negative impacts on host communities.
papers into the large scalloped circle and topped it with a Me to You Bear topper.
I signed up for an illustration course, quite by chance. Second Daughter was interested and in the end Brunella convinced me too. I already spoke of Brunella, her blog and her works. The more time passes and the more I admire what she does, therefore the idea of learning from her had me enchanted and at the same time terrorised.
UPDATE: Bread!
13 Working Assumptions (how I thought life operated when I was nineteen)
I set the fruit out to thaw on Friday night an on Saturday it was ready to process. After making 4 batches of peach, I set out peach juice and cherries to thaw overnight.
Genre: Teen Fiction, Paranormal Fiction, Mystery
After all of this, contact some Beta Readers. You will need to come up with a list and some of the earlier sites mentioned, like BookRix, are good for this sort of thing. The other thing you can do is post some of your story for free on your website or blog and request feedback. These are general readers. The main question is, do you want to keep reading the story? Are you intrigued? Is it entertaining?
The Nation
“I really don’t know what to do. I’m damned if I do and damned if I don’t. We are criticized whatever we do”. Thus spoke Mr. Botha after two and half years of exasperation, frustration and defeat at the hands of a worker who simply refused to move despite being fired. That one man could cause so much trouble is astounding. Only in South Africa! The Botha family has farmed near Potchefstroom for fifteen years on 1 000 ha. They farmed cattle and had a small dairy. One worker made their lives a misery: he was a regular drunkard, abusive and violent. He was fired by Mr. Botha and paid out, but he would not move. He and two other workers took the farm car one day and crashed it. The worker was hospitalized, and the farmer paid R20 000 for repairs to the car.
Saw info about this party at DebbieDoos for a Pet Party, and thought it would be fun. This is someone I already have tons of pictures of, so should be a no-brainer. It's also a great way to spend some time as I keep near my phone waiting for the "could come at any moment" less furry, pink-skinned grandbaby to begin his/her journey to our family.
As a matter of logic, by finding petitioners’ cause of action as anchored on a legal right comprised in the constitutional statements above noted, the Court is in effect saying that Section 15 (and Section 16) of Article II of the Constitution are self-executing and judicially enforceable even in their present form. The implications of this doctrine will have to be explored in future cases; those implications are too large and far-reaching in nature even to be hinted at here.
So provided that you are covering your rash and not hanging out at the maternity ward or repeatedly handling and kissing babies (Politicians take note), you can mingle with the shingles. Have fun and Merry Christmas.
The Google study also shows that 41% of smartphone users researched with their mobile device and went on to actually purchase on the smartphone. That data point is higher than in some other mobile commerce studies. For example, a study released in January 2012 by customer experience management firm ForeSee indicates that during the 2011 holiday season only 15% of online shoppers used their phones to make purchases. The phone was most commonly used as a research and price comparison tool. However, Google/Ipsos OTX studied only smartphone owners while ForeSee looked at online shoppers as a whole, a group that includes many feature phone owners as well.
So how has it gotten to this point?
I'm not sure where I'm going to go with this series. I borrowed the first three from Heather and I might read the rest, or I might not. Either way, I won't lose sleep over it. Obviously, that says something but I'll let you draw your own conclusions.
Okay, on to the card instructions. I started with a 5-1/2" x 8-1/2" piece of Wisteria Wonder card stock that was scored at 4-1/4". I stamped the card front with French Filigree in Wisteria Wonder ink. Next I cut a piece of Whisper White card stock 3-1/4" x 4-1/4". I stamped the French Filigree background stamp onto the Whisper White card stock in Concord Crush ink. Then I tore along the two long edges and sponged all the way around with more Concord Crush ink. I adhered this piece onto a 3-1/2" x 4-1/4" piece of Concord Crush card stock and then tore along the long edges of the Concord Crush card stock to create a mat. This panel was adhered onto the card front.
To start with I'm happy to announce that I've been included on the Bournemouth Based Artists websites which you can find here My friend Annika is also included and she is well worth checking out!
$5/25
In Britain the media is guilty of many lies, causing untold damage for which we can hope they will one day be held accountable, yet in respect of South Africa they share the guilt for even more bloody crimes.
Congratulations ladies!!! Please email me (Lora) at lorascards@aol.com to accept the position and I will invite you to our dt blog and give you all the info :))
Then one night I was sitting around the campfire in our backyard when my dad said I had a phone call. The director of the show had called me with a question. The girl playing Florinda, one of Cinderella’s step-sister’s, and a much more involved role, had been flaking out on rehearsals for the past couple of weeks and they decided to kick her out, and did I want that role? I didn’t even have to think about it—absolutely!
I remember one evening years ago my mother cut her finger on the razors edge of a canned ham. The exact circumstances surrounding the incident are unclear, but I know she was annoyed by either something my father did in his usual oblivion, or by me and/or my siblings in our own unique state of self-involvement. Either way, she just stood there bleeding from one hand and ham in the other – the result of loosing focus on the chore at hand due to aggravation. She did not want stitches, and she sure as hell didn’t want to go to a doctor. She sucked it all in, and with little assistance dressed her own wound. Tough as nails.
This could be a social problem. But should this study be used to advise patients to seek thin doctors? If you want a doctor that discusses weight loss with you, it’s much more efficient to ask a doctor to discuss it with you than it is to shop for a thin doctor (and hope you get one of the few that discusses weight loss). And if your fat doctor won’t discuss weight loss, I recommend finding a new doctor (of any weight), rather than trying to get your doctor to lose weight!
All my music turned into worship songs,
Let me know if you have any specific questions. I’ll try to cover a new topic on each video.
He put his hands out. She took them, and he brought her to her feet. He let go of her cold fingers to kneel and pick up her phone.
My husband and I have a custom of standing outside and waving goodbye to our kids when they leave from any family gathering. I've been known to run down the street waving goodbye and shouting, "I love you," as their vehicles grew smaller in the distance.
2 (32 oz) containers of chicken broth
You can also make multiple books that you can attach to each other. For instance, with each of my children’s books, I have a book with the name of the project that has all my notes and drawings and to-do’s for that single project. But I wanted a second book -attached to that project that had all my RESEARCH on that only that ONE project. So I attached a second book to it. So when I select that book project I want to work on – up pops up BOTH books and I can keep my research separate from the other “business” information.
He called, and well...... the rest is history!
The following is a recap of my three sessions today. It was fun, and tiring.
Harry, looking longingly outside...
I can't blame B's father, anymore than I can blame Bobby Brown for Whitney Houston's drug addiction. However, B's father did exactly what I asked him not to do. He gave my son cash. That's when I began to get a very bad feeling. In two week's time, B was given $240.00 in cash. His father would say that it was for this and that. I just knew differently. I didn't see my son producing the "items" his convinced his father that he needed the money for.
Khutorskoi, who was buried in Moscow on Saturday, had provided security at the press conferences of Stanislav Markelov, a lawyer who was shot dead in broad daylight last year. A former associate of a nationalist group called Russky Obraz, or “Russian Image”, has admitted to the crime but claims it was motivated by personal animosity, not politics, according to his lawyer.
4pm – Poolside Happy Hour & Daily Martinis
and baked potato, using our silver,
Bloemfontein - A traumatised Free State man has spoken about the horrific attack in which his pregnant 21-year-old daughter was raped by robbers.
Hen, who had not stopped staring at Marian since she walked in the door, leaned on her elbows toward the center of the table. “How come you wear a man’s hat?” she asked.
All that you ask for and all you desire
And I was just shocked. Shocked! I mean, I'm not an only child or anything, but my siblings are several years older than me. When I was their age, my siblings were babysitting me...there were no fights among us. I have no experience with this!
1 protested
current status of my relationship with my dad. I am sad that he doesn't know, and will never know, the love of his first grandchild. The love my son has to give, it's so powerful, so beautiful. So, it makes me sad, but never regretful. I have welcomed so much clarity, so much insight, about the mother that I am, the mother that I want to be, that there
we need to watch our pennies even more now as i quit my job on Monday & until i find a new one things will be tight.
While the rest of Europe faces austerity measures, Sweden has demonstrated that the conservative approach can lead to prosperity. Unfortunately, the Obama Administration ignores the valuable lessons offered by the economic recovery of Sweden. You have to wonder why?
So I was slow to watch this show, I’ll admit, for two reasons. The first being I don’t own a TV (I eventually did download it…and in an unusually intelligent move by FOX they are still allowing anyone to download it for free on iTunes). The second being as interesting as the show sounded, it had a hint of Kiefer Sutherland racing against a clock to stop something terrible from happening…and somehow that sounded a little too familiar.
Hey what happened to the guy, back in March, who kept writing to me and saying, “In two days, this blog will be shut down.” I am waiting.
We don't have a lot of male voices in the mermaid thing.
International Education league table from PISA
Servalakshmi
Hello My Create Friends !
his resurrection. What we glimpse of
We then strolled into the narrowest and oldest streets of Paris as we took in the sights and did a bit of shopping. It was so enjoyable walking around Paris on a wonderfully sunny Sunday afternoon. I couldn't think of a more special and memorable way to spend St. Valentine's Day other than being spending it here in the most romantic city in the world and sharing it with my family.
If you've lived in the area, this task is both difficult and easy. Easy because you don't have to do any outside research. Difficult because something familiar can be overlooked and taken for granted.
Ranked #22 on the AfterEllen.com "Hot 100" list of 2008.
By the way, Dave2 had a great point (spoiler alert) about another minor quibble with the film. I found it even more minor than he did, and I actually had a different issue with the same point. But, like I said, it was minor. The Avengers was a nearly flawless movie-going experience. Notice I didn't say that it was a nearly flawless film. Hard to judge that yet, but as a movie-going experience it ranks up there with Terminator 2: Judgement Day, LotR: The Fellowship of the Ring and Avatar. Three movies that made me shake my head and mouth "holy crap!" over and over and over again while watching them in the theater. Doesn't mean they were all incredible films, although I think the first two are. Avatar, besides the incredible effects, was largely forgettable for me. But that didn't distract from how awesome it was to see it in the theater.
So now we sift our flours and salt together. You could definitely use a mesh strainer or an actual drum sifter, but our chef said in a pinch, a whisk works just fine too.
that you are more
Also, the speed limit for Green P-Platers is 100km/h, not an inconsistent variation between 90 and 130.
Overall the book was very good. Sanderson tries to keep the action going and has a much more direct writing style that Jordan's flowery meandering style. All of the plot lines advance in a significant manner and you can see how things are lining end for the final book. One interesting chapter in this books deals with what's going to happen after all of this is over (assuming the Wheel of Time is not broken). It will be interesting to see how the issues raised in that chapter are dealt with in the final book.
Anyway, I will remember my Sault Ste. Marie “night out on the town” as
2 T vegan butter
Zac made her that way.
like the silver
Both sites are popular among drug smugglers and illegal border-crossers because of their remote locations and possible hiding places, according to an Arizona newspaper report. In just five months rangers have dug up 60 stolen or abandoned vehicles, 60 bikes and at least 24 tons of trash, according to U.S. Bureau of Land Management figures cited in the story. The rangers are armed and have helped arrest more than 1,200 illegal immigrants. Besides keeping watch, the rangers also lead cleanup efforts.
As for the hardware, when it all goes up, it will look like this. We went with black for contrast. Classic knobs on the doors, and a more contemporary handle style pull on all of the drawers. These are all from Lowe's. Super cheap! They also have brushed nickel if that's your preference.
This deafening finch is relatively discreet during the reproduction season, yet types huge, gregarious flocks during wintertime months season. It is found during summer mainly in coniferous jungles across boreal North america and in the Difficult Mountains; its winter season actions are both irregular and irruptive, likely due to varying food. Polytypic. Length 8" (20 cm).
Have you noticed how after it rains worms are all over the sidewalks?
The opposite natures in Lady Hero and Griffin draw like magnets and the tension builds. There are more complications as Hero recognizes that Griffin is much more - better - than society paints him. However she also discovers that Griffin is engaged in gin distillery and Hero’s ducal brother is set on hanging all such offenders.
Eric Dunaway
The Beholder’s magical abilities were so potent, she gave off a faint blue aura.
But this year went by so fast!
What's Patsy Cline Doing These Days (Parts 1 & 2) by Marvin Etzioni with Jon Wayne & Grey DeLisle
Our game was in Niles at 8pm, Saturday night. Woo hoo! Chuck and I dropped Nick off at the rink at 7; we had an entire hour to spare. I suppose we could have popped into a Starbucks for a warm caffeinated beverage, but it was a Saturday night (or as the Bay City Rollers would say S-A-T-U-R-D-A-Y Night!). Surely, we assumed, we could find a cocktail in Niles. We were right next door to the Golf Mill Mall for Heaven’s sake.
Are rejected by their peer group and feel isolated
Shit! I realized. I think I like romance novels!
Anyway, by moonlight, the Horse glows. We walked over the top of the Iron Age fort (past the much more recent barrow where Roman soldiers were buried) and down the slope in the watercolour moonlight, in the teeth of a sweeping cold wind, and down towards the head of the Horse. It lay there on the dim hill, its great eye and strange, open parallelogram of a head glowing mysteriously, almost appearing to throw more light back to the moon than the moon could give. Its body swept in a serpentine line over the slope of the hill, away out of sight.
Do you think knitting is relaxing? which one you like best, knitting or crotchet? why
All right, it has been one week since Steve and I started the weight loss part of our 2010 journey. Despite having massive amounts of gingerbread castle at our disposal I think we did pretty good!
On rocks and hills and mountains call,
Maybe I won’t get the BLT.
Since I’m working from home for a reason, a missed day is NOT the end of the world. I’ll just pick it back up the next day and proceed as if nothing happened.
So today I went back to that park to investigate the new inhabitant of the park’s center and here he is (and why I went to all that trouble to include the puzzle from “Car Talk”)…
“This ballpark has created as many memories for people in this area and around the world as any venue in the world,” Red Sox manager Bobby Valentine said before the ceremony. “The park here has at least a life of its own. A magic to it. It’s the baseball land of Oz. People dream about this place.”
So far, in my dealings with taxi drivers from our house to school (and vice-versa), I have noticed that there are four different ways to start at Point A and arrive at Point B. Now that I know there is a back-back-back way which actually avoids Ovalo Monitor (aka The Circle of Death). I have begun to tip my hack based on the cleverness of his route.
Perhaps that is why for all of us, once we learn of such a team we can’t help but love this very idea. The idea that these heroes exist in the same shared universe and fight side-by-side to take on the foes that they can face alone. It reminds us all that we live in a much larger world and that we must stand together to fight the foes that we ourselves can’t face alone.
I hope this is a bit of encouragement to you, my sisters in Christ… remember we are in this together… resting in His Promises, Carin Orth
Me: “That’s what cults always say.”
“And these signs shall follow them that believe….” Notice who is to do all these things: them that believe. The signs will follow the believers who act in faith and boldly speak in Jesus’ Name this is authority. They shall cast out devils; they shall speak with new tongues; they shall lay hands on the sick. Believers are the ones with the power and authority to do these things.
everything about it. Being just a few blocks from UC Berkeley, the shop was a
He’s left with 300 men.
So even if the independent artist DOESN'T have all this legal firepower at their behest, it's still just not a very nice thing to do when you copy someone's work and sell it as your own. Remember when you were in grade school? If you looked over at your neighbor's math test and started copying their answers, then got caught, wouldn't you have just died of embarrassment? Well, it's the same thing now that we're all (supposedly) grown-ups. You gotta play nice.
Love the bird, love the comet
Having spent his first two years playing defense against unsustainable spending, Mr. Christie is eager to start competing with neighboring states for jobs, talent and capital. Step one was to decide which tax reform would be the biggest draw for new residents and new businesses. He chose to attack the income tax because "that will be the thing that will make us the most competitive from a jobs perspective." His decision was made easier when he saw neighboring New York Gov. Andrew Cuomo push through an income-tax increase in December.
My bigger complaint with agenda administration is over-all support. While companies like Valve affiance that amateur purchased online will consistently be playable, even if the aggregation goes under, not all bold publishers are so kind. I've been austere by agenda administration before, and larboard with a abandoned accumulating of ones and zeros. It was an iPod bold by Bedrock Bandage developer Harmonix alleged Phase. Phase acclimated a adapted playlist in iTunes to actualize gameplay advance with your own music. At some point in the accomplished year or so, apparently afterward a software update, that playlist disappeared, and Phase chock-full animate entirely, even admitting the bold still appears in iTunes and on my iPod. I paid $5 for a bold I can no best play.
In two weeks time exactly, I will be in agony, having successfully completed the BUPA 10k. my legs will be on fire, and I will be falling asleep on my feet. My time? Only time will tell. Less than 1 hour 20 minutes will make me happy. Getting all the way round before I collapse in a heap will make me happy!!
Rambo this kid is not. You could probably toss a ball at him and he'd scream like a little girl and run crying to his mother. But knives are cool, apparently...
Indeed, Tesco's jumping on the bandwagon stems from a lost court case in Blackpool (admittedly, a prosecution and not a civil case) after a 16-year old was able to buy brain-pop on three occasions. Of course, in the no-win-no-fee, knickers-in-a-twist country we inhabit, this particular government has routinely surrendered to supposed moral panic regarding the decline of the nation by legislating to ride the crest of the frothed up rage.
Hell yeah, shark films rule! They manage to all at once be horrendously disappointing (mainly just on the basis that they are not Jaws, except for Jaws which is obviously Jaws) and being unbelievably exciting and satisfying simply because, irrespective of all else, they’ve got great big sharks eating stuff in them. I bloody love them. Stay tuned for my further adventures beneath the sea and in the depths of my DVD collection where I will explore such important issues as; what happens when you cross a shark with an octopus and can you actually fit sharks in Venetian canals.
Mark Twain could not have said it better:
*Additional 5X6ft. personalized tarpaulin backdrop
I must have quadrupled my lifetime’s Icewine consumption in three days – some wineries presented four different Icewines for me to try and one partnered almost every course in a meal with Icewine – I suppose that you have to be creative in its use if you have a lot of Icewine to get through!
Garlic-Nut Spaghetti
I decided research if there was a deeper meaning to ‘flax’ and, more importantly, ‘flax dam’:
These kids benefit from repeated experiential and visual learning. It's one of the areas in which television, computers and audio devices excel. I've discussed at length before about how historical movies can teach history to visual learners far more effectively than classroom discussions. The same is true for computers, particularly math applications and even audiobooks, iPads and phones.
Although, that actually isn't much of my book, considering that it's an extremely long, 116,000 words (and counting.)
1. Waitin' On You (King, Washington)
I’m hopeful of some decent weather and, being an angler, I’m a firm believer in cultivating luck. Consequently, I’m steering clear of black cats, walking around ladders, avoiding women with a squint and taking solace in the thought that a wet April will be a sour precursor to balmy May.
Truly, I just want to wander and be my self. Not necessarily by myself, but just be me. I'm looking forward to it, and there is no doubt I'll miss my little family too!
Whitby, of Holley Place, Stoke-on-Trent, said he was an EDL supporter and had travelled by train to Leicester on the day of the protest with about 30 people from Stoke and Crewe.
Taking the typical tricks and tropes of the genre, Whedon and Goddard have concocted a film that by all outwardly appearances looks to be that same said typical horror flick, but once turned inside out and/or upside down, becomes a creature unlike anything else in this world or the next. After a short prelude of men and women in lab coats walking around some sort of sterilized government-esque facility, talking about their marital problems and having mysterious conversations about how Stockholm has fallen and how the Japanese will always be number one, screen-filling red block letters announce the title in what appears to be an homage of sorts to Michael Haneke's Funny Games, and we are underway. Next up we see the stereotypical college kids (suspiciously quite post-grad looking in appearance) getting ready for a weekend trip to the titular vacation spot, all in their respective genre-specific roles. This is where we see the typical genre archetypes line up for the slaughter. At this point, if you think you know what is coming next, think again. Than after that, think again some more. Repeat when and if necessary.
The great thing about these is that I can batch up all the bits and pieces - beads, charms, cords and clasps and then sit quite happily making them whist I watch TV. I can't do that with most of my jewellery pieces that's for sure.
So, from here on out, between the storms and the sickness, not a lot was accomplished on the wrap. I figured I would come home and share this dreadful story, along with the first picture of my knitting on the plane. the post was then to be called "All I Have", in which I would explain that I only have one lousy picture for you.
However, I’ve noticed that Paganism generally seems to have become a very insular spirituality. While folk do seek others of like mind to meet up and chat, in pubs or at Camps, generally their practise is kept private, at home or in quiet places outside, alone. This may be due to fear of ridicule, actual need for secrecy because of misunderstanding, or just a preference for a solitary mode of worship; I’ve no problem with that at all. Ultimately, any conversation that you have with deity is just the two of you.
I have had several blog posts in the works for some time now, but some require further research to complete, and others require greater motivation. But I should, hopefully, have something new to publish here in the next few weeks.
They also queried the inhumane treatment of inmates who ended up killing themselves. In one case, an inmate was locked in a cell that had no lights and, in another, an inmate who said he had been raped was found hanged in the shower area of the cell. There had been a delay in transferring him to a rape centre, allegedly because there was no transport available. The nurses who failed to examine the man were acquitted in a disciplinary hearing, and the officials who failed to arrange his transport to a rape centre were given a final warning. The MPs were unhappy with the lack of action against errant prison officials.
The gathering last week was to celebrate the engagement of him to her, and it coincided with a birthday that he wanted to keep quiet.
Your word is my light, so I will never lose my way.
From this day forward, I will claim it.
So this cookbook is from a short lived Lifetime show which took women’s favorite dishes and showed how to make them in a less-fattening way. It’s surprisingly yummy and easy to make. One of my favorite subs is for loaded potatoes skins. I know what you’re thinking…how in the world do you make potato skins healthy. It’s great with roasted sweet potatoes and roasted veggies whipped in there and very minimal cheese melted on top. It’ll be a big hit at your next super bowl party I promise!
And I speak as one one who has read all Dickens and adores him!
catch his turn of phrase or tone of voice
And yet Jesus does exactly what Yahweh does! The reason why? Because he is Yahweh God the Son! To put this in a form of syllogism:
I have projected my condemnation of myself onto other people.
Recent events on a few parenting sites, and The Leaky BOOBs facebook page, makes me feel it is important to address how we share our parenting choices.
Why do we fill our shelves with knick knacks? Is it to simply fill empty surfaces? Why must they be filled? Are we afraid of hurting someone's feelings (by not displaying a gift)? Is it to show off our wealth? Is it to remember someone? Is it to prove that we are educated and cultivated (shelves of books)? Is it to escape our own reality ("this shell reminds me of happy vacation times")? Is it to prove that we have been places and are wordly (tiki statuette)? The last three especially ring true to me.
A new house is like a new friend.
Today I went to the gym. (I have gone to the gym every day since January 1st). (I am still not hot).
Holy crap I just had one of the best meals ever!! I’m so excited I’m not even sure I can give you specific details about everything (that and I inhaled my food, not leaving much time for contemplation). Also, I am REALLY really full, so I need to sprawl out flat on the couch as soon as possible.
Scatter noodles in skillet. Layer tomatoes over noodles and bring to a simmer. Reduce heat to medium and cook, stirring occasionally for about 10 minutes.
The circumstances of the death, it was reported, were that at about 14:00 that day, the grandmother of the 8 year old child left the male visitor with the child when she went out to buy beer. On her return she realised that the child was chewing something. She then asked the male visitor whether the child has been ‘stealing the meat or not’. The visitor's response was that she had ‘been taking meat from the pot and ate it’.
Here is the link to Amazon Kindle, a colour version is available on other devices that support the kindle app! and hopefully a paperback copy will be available one day! This book is also available in the USA, Europe and of course the UK!
Blend the mango, sprite, sugar and lime juice in a blender or food processor until smooth. Adjust seasoning as needed—remember the mixture should taste slightly sweeter in the liquid form to get the right sweetness when it is frozen.
JER 17:8 He will be like a tree planted by the water
While she's telling Elizabeth all of this, her thoughts segway into a description about how gorgeous Liz is, lest we forget that even when the story doesn't actually concern them, we should in fact be talking about the Wakefields. So Enid still keeps in touch with George and she's scared of telling Ronnie because he'll freak the fuck out, due to him being a possessive dickhead who gives her shit for talking to anyone male about anything ever. She shows one of his letters to Elizabeth and then they suddenly have a lame pillow fight where neither one of them notices one of the letters falling onto the bedroom floor. THANKS, FREDDIE FORESHADOWING.
Not WIP related but another completed stitch.
Fax me: 303-617-6422
Opium Mar
Remember that no matter how you came to be a blended family, whether it was from divorce or a death of a parent, that this was a defining moment in your step child’s life. Something happens when all of the wedding festivities are over, and many times the child will feel insecure. You may have had the greatest relationship with the child prior to the wedding or even engagement, but the wedding marks the end of a chapter in their lives. It marks the end of the possibility that mom and dad might get back together.
Thanks?
Together, Midas Earthcote and ICC have developed the most internationally advanced colour tinting system, which uses specific pigments for interior and exterior application. When ordering, it is important to specify whether the product will be used internally or externally. The Midas tinting system also offers more environmentally responsible formulations containing Glycol-free pigments – available in our Envirolite range, on request.
Just two weeks prior to that, several shareholders of E&O had raised their stakes in the company. GK Goh, on three consecutive days, increased its stake to 12% while Datuk Azizan Abd Rahman, a director of E&O, purchased 100,000 shares.
John allowed his new friends to know he was looking for work. The word was passed around. John was made aware of an opening on the royal security force. John’s friends were the sons of French Courtiers. The Royal Guard, likewise, was made up of the same group of select people. John eventually found work as a member of the Royal Guard.
The sea was never so blue, the sail never so white.
Another couple things I loved about the House Sorter, were the adorable designs sewn into the house and the cute colors and different textures! I especially love the handle on top of the house, because it makes it easy to carry around..and "DD" loves to carry it around with her!
For the Caramel
I love to watch designers put flower arrangements together~
Thanks for visiting today!
Can you believe it? I can't.
May 13—Mothers’ Day—DARK
See anything wrong with this picture?
A few images from my recent wanderings around The Woodlands, Texas. This part of the township is probably amongst the highest priced real-estate in the area, situated close to the lake, and within a short distance from the mall, the business area, and a couple of miles from the interstate, for the commute to Houston or access to the airport.
It's weird.
and as you breathe out, say: Your will be done
Why don’t you ever see the headline “Psychic Wins Lottery”?
Lightning and thunder
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Lightly spray a small casserole dish or gratin dish with cooking spray.
We may have glimpses of freedom and mystic states, through religion, through entheogens, love, compassion, family life, child birth, work, activity and meditative practice, and it is clear these will and do bring about a deepening of our openness to spirituality, to life. But without choosing from a sober place, to surrender life the to the mystic state, even these can become a way to engage with phenomenon, with experiences, with growth, with change and to by definition, miss dealing with the root cause of our dissatisfaction, our fear of the natural uncaused bliss true meditation in the sense discussed exposes us to. As Ramana Maharishi stated; “when the mind, one pointed and fully focused, knows the supreme silence in the heart, this is true learning. “
Last night they faced the injury laden and controversial Orlando Magic and they still couldn’t win. The Magic went on a few huge runs, made some shots from behind the arc and the Bobcats were not able to get out a win. It sad to see a team lose so much and so badly but in the world of sports, this is sometimes a reality that many face. It’s good I’m not a coach, because I don’t even know what you would say to a team like this.
19. “Lonely Boy” by The Black Keys
Pretty good, especially in the post-Scream era of self-aware hipsters who sarcastically deconstruct the movies they star in. I still think the story would have made more sense if he Natalie and Michelle characters had switched roles, but most of the kills were creatively staged and fun. Oh, and many of the kills needed to be
Heavens,no! My kids are all very excited about the whole thing, and they keep trying to get me to reveal what is going to happen next, but if I used them as a sounding board my daughter would insist on heaps more romance, and my little boy would settle for nothing less than a complete gore-fest. I'm not sure how I could satisfy both of those demands.
Here an old scale holds pretty soaps and a towel, but when I placed the coral & starfish on there -- LOVE it!!
Here's their performance of the night. Ryan is playing guitar, Eric is on bells and back up vocals, and Lizzie is lead vocals (and no, Eric isn't wearing a headband. It's a headset mic :) ).
The plot is neither linearly nor logically linked but rather a mish-mash of the author’s ideas, resulting in disjointed chapters that varied greatly in content and length.
(I Will Send You An Email With Swap Partners Details)
1John 5:8: And there are three that bear witness in earth, the Spirit, and the water, and the blood: and these three agree in one.
“Myth and archetype, as well as the influence of masters of the Gothic tale, seep in from the groundwater in Jonathan Thomas’s world, but the landscape is wholly his own. The stories amuse, challenge, and unsettle.”—From Sherry Austin’s Foreword
Anthony Edwards – Stoner Bud
I Could sleep 'neath the moon.
Instead, I'd shut off the television and wandered up to my room. I didn't exactly remember collapsing on the bed, but since I'd woken up there I was prepared to take that part for granted...
Then the Congress of Vienna met, which brought together all the heads of state, to decide the future of Europe after Napoleon. This was one of Beethoven’s moments of glory. He was invited to play many times, bringing him recognition and admiration of which he could be truly proud.
One of my favorites is:
And if you really want to have your stomach turn about our wasteful spending, go to Dirty Spending Secrets and see how the government flushes are money down the toilet. Chinese prostitutes have a drinking problem, we spend money to correct that. You are a federal employee and do not want to fly coach, don’t worry, upgrade to business class. And the hits keep coming………
punches (border/corner)
Her Royal Highness Princess Bajrakitiyabha Mahidol, the eldest daughter of His Royal Highness Crown Prince Maha Vajiralongkorn, currently serves as Ambassador and Alternative Representative of the Kingdom of Thailand to the United Nations Commission on Crime Prevention and Criminal Justice (CCPCJ). In December 2011, following a distinguished career at the Office of Attorney-General, Her Royal Highness was elected Chairperson of the CCPCJ. As a seasoned prosecutor-cum-diplomat, she brings a wealth of practitioner’s experience to the policy-making process of the Commission, particularly in strengthening standards and norms in crime prevention and criminal justice, as well as in promoting integrated responses to transnational organized crime in all of its manifestations.
I chose the ISABELLA BOWLING BAG!
25. Roanoke
system must be changed
Videoed the birth. I wish I could remember every detail, but its just impossible when you’re in the throes of it all.
Some days he has these big ideas and strong opinions and I just smile and nod and calmly find ways to distract him
Oh I just can't wait to win this thing. (wishful thinking right?)
Scot Meacham Wood – I was taking part in a marketing seminar in early 2008 and the speaker was asking about people’s interest in social media. “Who has a facebook page? A twitter page?” and I was proudly raising my hand with each question . . . until “Who has a blog?” - and then, seriously, you could have heard a pin drop. The only blog that I was familiar with was “The Sartorlialist.” But, I went home that night - dug around a bit - and discovered the myriad of design blogs . . . and I wanted to be part of it. And the next night, at around midnight, “The Adventures of Tartanscot” was born. I think like all bloggers, it was started simply to document things that happen in our lives, but the community of bloggers and blog readers has really inspired me.
Anyone wanting to punch, throw the equipment at or spit upon the customer service agent has to go through the plexiglass and the talking vent in order to do so.
Please feel free to participate in the first poll I am launching on my Blog!
The planet Lusitania is home to three sentient species: the Pequeninos, a large colony of humans, and the Hive Queen, who was brought there by Ender Wiggin. But now, once again, the human race has grown fearful; the Starways Congress has gathered a fleet to destroy Lusitania. Ender’s oldest friend, Jane, an evolved computer intelligence, can save the three sentient species of Lusitania. She has learned how to move ships out-side the universe, and then instantly back to a different world, abolishing the light-speed limit. But it takes all the processing power available to her, and the Starways Congress is shutting down the network of computers in which she lives, world by world. Soon Jane will not be able to move the ships. Ender’s children must save her if they are to save themselves.
Unfortunately, though, Intensity has the notorious reputation as the last recording trumpeter Lee Morgan participated in (done two days before his girlfriend shot him to death). But Morgan is perhaps the least notable aspect of what makes the record work well. His playing here - and elsewhere at the time - sounds rather indifferent, sometimes sloppy and far less stellar than the glowing commentary he offered up on a string of excellent Blue Note records throughout the 1960s (evident on his own lackluster "Speedball," also included here).
Best moment of the week: Taking Anna to get pictures with Santa (Ho Ho – as she calls him), spending the weekend with my in-laws and also getting to meet my new baby cousin Ellie.
Ken Livingstone's team are privately conceding defeat in the London mayoral contest. My colleague Hélène Mulholland has been talking to them, and she says they are resigned to Boris Johnson winning. They even think that Johnson will increase his majority. In 2008 Johnson had 53% of the vote when second preferences were included, and Livingstone was on 47%. I shall refrain from rejoicing until I know for sure but, as I said before, in 2008 LIvingstone's team knew well ahead of the official announcements. As did the bookies who started paying out in the afternoon.
Laszlo Moholy-Nagy (5 gelatin silver prints and 1 film, 1923-1925, 1925, 1926, 1930)
Len told her she might not be the best dancer, but she is the most charismatic. Bruno wanted her to be a bit steamier. Carrie Ann thought the hip action was fantastic but did point out that she forgot parts of the dance.
Seems obvious, but NOBODY does it purposely.
In just 3 days from now, we have near 60 degree temperatures
Tomorrow at 5pm, as we do every Tuesday, we are tapping a ridiculously amazing keg on our growler station! This week we're fired up to have Foothills Bourbon Barrel-Aged People's Porter! This is an absolutely delicious roasty & creamy porter to start and then it is aged in select, wet Kentucky Bourbon barrels to add beautiful notes of oak and vanilla. This extremely limited, draft only beer is rarely available so don't miss out!
Faye Dunaway is also perfectly cast as the seemingly poised and in-control femme fatale Evelyn Mulwray, exhibiting an underlying damaged quality that prevents her ultimate reveal as the victim from being out of the blue without robbing it of its capacity to shock. Legendary screenwriter William Goldman has said that good movies feel both inevitable and surprising and 'Chinatown' certainly has this strange seemingly contradictory quality.
The young singer has also been earning many celebrity admirers. Some of the celebrities who favor Jessica as listed are the following:
Well, after waiting around all day on Thursday my operation finally went ahead. I got to the hospital at 11am and was asked to put my gown on at 4pm!! I was beginning to think they may run out of time and cancel but thank goodness it did happen. I was put out for around an hour and half and the used key hole surgery on my shoulder. It turns out my shoulder was frozen and the surgeon had the cut the capsules surounding my shoulder joint to allow me move movement. i've already had physio and it's b****y painful but at least it's been done, which has to be a good thing. I have loads of exercises to do which I must keep up with and will be off work for some weeks yet but I guess it's all positive from now. No photos to share today but hope to make some more cards next week as it's my left arm in a sling so hope I can work one handed!
Just being with what comes up,
Hello Sentimental Sundays Followers!
So, you see, there is absolutely no excuse to sit at home on the beautiful Spring days for which our area is famous. Call your friends, grab your sunglasses and head Downtown to savor all that Greenville has to offer! See you there!
Giveaway closes November 13th@ 11:00 pm (EST) Winner will be picked November 14th by Random.org and notified by email, a post will follow. Winner will have 48 hours to reply to my email otherwise a new winner will be picked.
For example, we must constantly be thinking about techniques, design, ideas, methodologies, concepts, processes and rendering. We also think about more personal things like that which motivates us, our inspirations, and that which we like and dislike about our work. We explore new subjects and techniques. We think about current and future projects, the steps it takes to finish and how to best organize our projects. Some artists like myself, have five or six major projects going at once.
The Doctor and his companions decide to put a stop to their rule – but in doing so, inadvertently unleash the true power and terror of the Krotons instead...
I have discussed the NATM Strategic Plan in earlier blogs. Today I am doing a webinar for new board members and I will be including a review of the strategic plan. As I was preparing the presentation I realized that we need to update the plan. We have accomplished several goals and changed directions on others. A strategic plan is only effective if it is continually reviewed and updated.
I will admit I was a little embarrassed by his behavior ( I should clarify, I wasn't embarrassed by him, but by the fact that other people had paid money for the class too and he was being disruptive. I should also say he wasn't the only one running around, but he kind of got the others wound up). He wasn't terrible by any means,but he wouldn't sit still for any length of time (Littles sat the entire time, like an angel). I tired my hardest to get him to join in, but with both of the kids there, well I can't be two place at once. So I finally made the decision to be an example, by participating in the class with Littles instead of chasing after Boog (in hopes he would see Mama and Sissy and want to do what we were doing, plus I didn't want Littles time spoiled).
“Go on back where?”
1 crushed garlic clove, optional
As happens to so many of us, Lint's youthful dreams – in his case of a career in the music business – are crushed, and he goes to work in his father's financial company instead. He puts his hellraising behind him, gets married, buys a house, has children (there's a one-panel birth scene that reminded me of Miracleman #9); does all those things he spent his formative years railing against, things which, for many, are more important, more worthwhile and more rewarding than the fleeting, facile pleasures of a football game or recording studio. And Lint does begin to comprehend that, but then tips over too far the other way, finds God (a transformation that's foreshadowed at a football game from Lint's youth, and that will have consequences that won't become clear until much later), and ultimately ruins his marriage by shacking up with a younger woman.
the incessant and annoying
On Wednesday (21 March) Whimsy Stamps released this month's rubber designs, new Shapeology dies and new Shape EZ templates. From then until 27 March the Whimsy Stamps DT and Special Guests are showcasing these fabulous new goodies with a daily mini blog hop and I am part of today’s hop!
Beaded necklace: made by me!
My beta readers all say I have written a young adult novel.
We are surrounded by so great a cloud of witnesses; sometimes family, sometimes friends and yes, sometimes church members. We can be supported and encouraged by these wonderful people. So much so that we can lay aside every weight burdening us down.
What, you may think, has this to do with our own elections? Nothing, actually.
The walk between the hydrolectrico station and Aguas Calientes is quite pleasant running alongside a river with mountains and cloud forest all around. The well-maintained trail is almost completely flat and there are only a few places that we need to walk across the actual train tracks. Coming Mika and I spot an agouti - a large jungle rodent, and the Andean Cock-of-the-Rock - the national bird of Peru. And I swear to Pachamama that I did not make up that name! On the way back a few days later we see and hear two squawking groups of green parrots, about twelve in all.
2. Leonardo da Vinci’s “Mona Lisa” is in which Paris museum?
The first one is is for carrots, carved out of tree branches. These are soo cute. They also have instructions for other vegetables on this blog as well. Instructions can be found at www.duofiberworks.com
That is good advice for anyone. When directed at people of color it reminds of the saying that women/people of color have to be twice as competent as men/white people to be treated equally. If this is true, that to be welcomed as equal women/people of color must excel, then that leads me a to a conclusion. The ultimate form of white privilege–the freedom to be mediocre.
The graphics are amazing. If you have a good computer. Mine is not. I had to set everything to low and turn off all the special settings and the game still lagged a bit. The screenshots of the game set on high look great though. Lots of shiny, glowy things.
That’s usually how that figure is bandied around. It’s actually larger than the entire population of Russia was at the time, so it’s got an amusing dimension to it. Obviously, Stalin was not only killing all his own people including himself, but also some invented ones too.
Good things are happening in China and the Far East! And do take note, Liao Yiwu does say China is still in great need of missionaries, those who will go to the vast number of isolated (and unreached) villages to bring the gospel to those peoples!
VERITAS, the VERITAS Logo, VERITAS Enterprise Administrator, and
to lose.
page 85
The menu features macchiato, espresso, cappuccino, and even a kid-friendly babyccino (frothy milk for sophisticated toddlers). There is also a large selection of tea and freshly made juices, as well as all kinds of sandwiches, cakes and cookies to go with them. Many things on the menu are organic and a brunch including organic bread and scrambled eggs is served on weekends. The free wifi is also a great draw if you're looking for somewhere to work whilst you get your afternoon caffeine fix.
In the Animals’ version, the singer is a male, the son of a gambler who has abandoned his wife and child for “The House of the Rising Sun” — either a gambling house or a bar. At least, that’s how I understand the story. One of the attractive aspects of this song is how ambiguous it is, both in its story line and in its origins. For one thing, who’s singing the song — a woman, or a man? And what’s happening?
Fast forward and Mia is three years old. Jenna gets devasting news. She is diagnosed with cancer. Its actually the same kind of cancer that her mother had and died from when Jenna was a young woman. She goes through the process and begins treatment and it goes on for four years. Sadly, Jenna gets news that its now progressed and she knows what the outcome is so she decides to stop treatment and to live what little life she has to the fullest with her Gabe and Mia.
Keep her heart inside your pocket, wear it like a golden locket.
We have a responsibility for our kin, and a duty to them. We have a duty to pass on what we have inherited to our children, as they, in turn, will have a duty to their children. We owe a debt to our ancestors who bequeathed to us our nation and culture and we must honour that.
I keep meaning to get back to regular posting, but 4-month old babies keep you surprisingly busy. ;) There's not much time for cooking, much less writing blog posts! Luckily this pork shoulder has minimal hands-on time and will feed a small army. You prep it the night before you want to eat and just stick it in the oven the next morning.
Are they worth hemming up?
To help burn off some of that Perhentian belly blub we went kayaking on the 4th day and then some more snorkelling of our own. The high light was clearly when we noticed we were right next to a giant turtle which was in about 5 foot of water near the shore. It let us swim with him before going out too deep for me to go. I wished I had an underwater camera at that point. However there are some pics that we’ve borrowed for the experience.
The past few days we've had a warm up. A sneak peak to Spring. Yesterday reached 55 and today is supposed to get to 60. It's wonderful. The snow isn't melting fast enough, but it is melting. There are peaks of mud under trees and bushes, while the vast majority of the ground remains covered. Even so, the weather has improved my mood.
What is it about twelve that sends children into this odd journey into the unknown? K-boy can be described most accurately now not as a child, but as a half-grown man. He's nearly matched me in height, he shaves, and he's rapidly developing a funny, cynical view of life.
3 tablespoons tomato past.
This year proved to be quite a challenge ... Forget-me-nots just took over my small backyard ... and as much as I hated to do it ... I had to hack a bunch of them down ... just to gain ground!
Thanks to the district of this High School the students were allowed to return to school the next day, stating that it is not a district policy to forbid a student from wearing an American flag t-shirt on ANY day. The boys returned wearing, guess what, t-shirts with American flags on them, GOOD FOR YOU BOYS!!!!
10. I am an invisible man. —Ralph Ellison, Invisible Man (1952)
Guess I will figure it out.
Ancestry: She is the offspring of supernatural parents and unnatural creatures take to her.
“Will that be allowed?” I asked.
“Equality,” I spoke the word
Within a few minutes the whole camp was fully awake. Everyone came out with sticks, hammers, spades, shovels and torches. But where was the lioness? She had vanished. The bonfires were relit. That night almost no one could sleep, though no one ventured to stay out. Shankar had fallen asleep near dawn when he was awaken by loud noise. Simba! Simba! The Masai coolies were yelling. Shankar went out to enquire what happened. A horse was taken he found out. This had happened just when everyone finally found some sleep!
I seem to have dropped of the face of the blogging world. I didn’t intend to, but once I headed home I found myself running from friend to family, days filled with various lunches, dinners, and catch-up sessions. I only get home about three times a year so when I do I love to use every minute seeing my friends and family.
A report published today by Transparency International UK reveals that corruption is a much greater problem in the UK than recognised and that there is an inadequate response to its growing threat. More than half of the public believe that UK corruption is getting worse. The 3-volume report – the most extensive study into UK corruption ever undertaken – examines 23 sectors and concludes that key institutions are refusing to confront the problem.
Wakes each day with a desire to write
Mix the sugar with the cinnamon and roll the doughnuts while they are warm in this mixture. You can also fill the doughnuts with your favorite jam.
Him : No, no, no. I am dating her exclusively. I just don’t see her as a future wife. I’m not gonna break up with her simply because of that. Does that make sense?
Yoochun look at the calendar. August 8 2008. His eyes widened, smile appeared from his ducky lips. He hug Junsu tightly.
Today’s Adventure:
to help educate families,
Looking at the facility through educated eyes, we feel that it is a state of the art facility in many respects but it will be quite restrictive. GCCF will be classified as a medium custody facility.We understand what the goals are of the Department of Corrections and that security is the first priority. It is evident at GCCF. We feel that the facility will meet the needs of the offenders doing time at GCCF but on a scale that may not be geared toward rehabilitation.
Me: He’s in heaven sitting beside God the Father. Guess what he’s doing?
cause now i'm free
I hear this is like a milestone or something.
The Vermilion Local Schools is sponsoring a “Get Involved” evening in effort to create a drug-free community.
ATTENTION SENIORS -
Both good and bad.
Best powerhouse all-purpose: Lysol Bathroom Cleaner: This disinfectant makes quick work of ordinary challenges on all bathroom surfaces. It also breaks through lime scale and soap scum. The foam-producing nozzle means less dripping (and waste).
“Goodbye – and thank you!” The coach rumbled into the night, with Cinderella and her problems now solved.
One of the things I enjoy most when I'm writing is to make characters whose reactions wouldn't be what we'd predict from our own experience, but which make complete sense within their own worldviews and levels of intelligence. For example, my servant caste character, Aloran, is highly trained and believes firmly in the vocation of service, which is to say that he believes in selflessness and in putting his mistress' concerns before his own. He and his mistress have a number of interactions where she shows consideration for him - and though he's grateful for her consideration, he also thinks that it is at times inappropriate, as when she puts herself in danger of reprisal for defending him. In the situation, he internally urges her to stand her ground against her abusive husband. However, when the interaction is over he realizes that her bravery is going to have horrible consequences - and he bows to her and says, "I beg you, please don't consider me again." It isn't what we'd do, it's what he would do - and because we know him, we can see that it is what he would do.
I did this LO in less than an hour and I just love it! I love the picture of my sister and I and I love my sister! Annnd I love that this LO uses the current Scrapbook Circle kit and all of the new MME goodies!!! TFL!
It seems that the Middle East, an area we prejudiced Americans often times see as culturally backwards, is having a bit of a cinematic renaissance lately. With second generation Iranian New Wave-ers like Abbas Kiarostami and Jafar Panahi, A Separation (my review of which can be found here), and the film this article concerns, I think that this geographic region, along with Nigeria’s burgeoning film industry, may potentially spark a new artistic movement that has world-wide repercussions. But I digress, and move back to the main topic at hand.
A smack of jellyfish
The sixth; he burst five buttons off,
We’d never had to deal with asthma before let alone managing it in a child with chronic lung disease. Our first sign that something was wrong was when Emma* came down with a cold, she started to sound a little wheezy. So off to the doctors we went to be unable to answer the numerous question on her background medical history. We were so frustrated it felt like we were flying blind and everything was trial and error. Within 12 hours we were sitting in the emergency department at the local hospital. This is where we first realised how much time Emma* must have spent in medical treatment. There was no fear from her, she was so compliant, even when it came to some unpleasant procedures. She would just hold out her little arm and sit and watch.
i’m starting to have second thoughts about putting myself in compromising positions (that lady really gets in there) and unthinkable amounts of pain every four weeks. and what for? the off-chance that i’ll meet him and we’ll fall into bed immediately? pretty much, yeah.
Deutsch will receive the 2011 gold medal in the Sydney Taylor Book Award’s Older Readers Category for Hereville: How Mirka Got Her Sword, published by Amulet Books, an imprint of Abrams Books. This is the first graphic novel to win the Award. Committee member Aimee Lurie noted, “Mirka is a clever, headstrong and imaginative heroine who will appeal to a wide audience. Teens who feel like they don’t fit in will have no trouble relating to her balancing what is best for her family versus her desire to fight dragons. Grounded in her religious beliefs, she is willing to put her fantasies aside to celebrate Shabbat. The illustrations strike the perfect balance of showing a realistic Orthodox community, while creating the perfect backdrop for a fairytale.”
This film, released in 1946, nearly forty years before I was born, has made a major impact on my life. Not only is it the first “old” movie I recall watching as a young child, but it also ignited my love affair with classic films. It has also been a source of comfort at times when, like grown-up George Bailey, my problems seemed insurmountable and I thought perhaps it would be better if I’d never been born.
I want to start this out by saying I truly don't mind tax day, and I believe we should all pay our share of taxes, but I absolutely loath getting things ready for this big day in the United States. I think I may need to hear from the rest of you on some easy organization tips to help prepare for this onslaught of receipts and paperwork.
Going to the USPS site, I found this warning. In short, it says to NOT open these emails as unwanted viruses will attack and possibly steal information. Delete the email and everything will be fine.
I can’t stop thinking about this family. Praying for them.
Blais speculates that a suspect stuffed the drugs through the crack to prevent police from finding them. Burrillville Lt. Kevin San Antonio says Hartford police were "apologetic" when he told them of the discovery.
Yesterday I noticed:-
Sailors are munching them near the ship’s bow..
:) So send me your address, girlie and I'll get those goodies out to you asap!!
In response, the Islamists rejected the military's economic program, which included badly needed loans from places like the IMF. This could lead to an early decision by the junta to let the Isalmists form a temporary civilian government until elections in June.
A shelter protecting from merciless pain,
At the time, September, 1939 the second world war was only in Europe, quite far from the Philippines and had just begun. There was then no likelihood of the Philippines being involved in the war until more than two years later, in December, 1941. The National Assembly was then free to meet either in regular or special session to enact legislation to meet the emergency. In fact, it met in regular session in January, 1941 lasting 100 days and in January, 1941 for another regular session of 100 days, excluding the several special session held during those two years. And yet the Assembly delegated legislative powers to the President under section 26, Article II of the Constitution. This is clear proof that, contrary to the theory of the majority opinion, the Legislature delegated legislative powers to the President even when it could meet and it actually met several times.
If there is one thing that we have need to suggest that we look at this day, it is this theme of balance. And of course this speaks to economics. It speaks to the resources, the universal resources, not only of Gaia but of far beyond. For this is something you do not often think about — how you, as humans, as star-seeds, as inter-galactics, have access to all the resources of the universe.
The crowd went silent except for one drunk fool. “We didn’t bring a club to a gun fight,” he said chuckling.
We should now by this stage be able to evaluate better whether Mussolini's Fascism was Right-wing, Left-wing or neither. As already outlined, its rhetoric certainly had strong Left-wing elements. The 1919 election manifesto, for instance, contained policies of worker control of industry, confiscation of war profits, abolition of the Stock exchange, land for the peasants and abolition of the Monarchy and nobility. Further, Mussolini never ceased to inveigh against "plutocrats".
But all in all: I feel as though I am beginning to see the light at the end of the tunnel.
so instead of trying to repay you
Cynthia Gaub For many years I have wanted to create art in the medium of Stained Glass. My glass window collage series was aiming to have the transparency and feeling of stained glass. Many of the pieces look wonderful with light shinning behind them. I like the compartmentalized look of stained glass and have even tried to translate that idea into fabric.
Bailey’s Irish Cream Cheesecake. The perfect dessert to celebrate St. Patrick’s Day. If you get it done in time.
Carelessness toward your overall health can result in the rejection of term life insurance. If you are otherwise in perfect health and you smoke, frequently use drugs, have numerous speeding tickets or have been arrested for driving while intoxicated, the insurance company may feel that you are irresponsible and cannot look after yourself.
118 10. “Impeachment: Playing With Fire?” University of Chicago Maroon, November 30, 1973, pp. 2, 6. Reprinted in Chicago Sun-Times, December 9, 1973, sec. 1-A, pp. 3, 14; in Congressional Record, vol. 119, p. 38757; Daily Record, pp. E7595-E7596 (November 29, 1973); in Congressional Record, vol. 119, p. 39073; Daily Record, pp. E7672-E7673 (December 1, 1973); and in Congressional Record, vol. 119, p. 43418; Daily Record, pp. E8185-E8186 (December 1, 1973). (Source: Item D-X1/27/1973, below.)
Witchy_Girl
The NEP has been soiled by the greed for riches. There has been twists and delusion of the policy that now has already divided the nation. The rich are becoming filthy rich and the poor are becoming dirt poor and this is apparent within any single ethnic group. Racial unity is debased when social and economic justice have been ignored.
I had NO FREAKING IDEA that you couldn't follow me unless I was on Twitter or FB. I guess we could subscribe in RSS, right? So, I added that as soon as I stumbled downstairs this morning.
My best friend from college, Gail, is fortunate to live on St. Simons, so we stayed with her. Gail took us to some new places we haven’t been and that was fun. As always, my camera was stuck to my hip!
Money Remaining: $256,967
We sell them over two days for $2-5 per can. It has been a great project, and one that myself and my ex-colleague are proud to have initiated. I will be posting a packet soon with more details.
PS:
Borg and Osborne have a good relationship, as do David Cameron and Reinfeldt (who keep in touch via text message). All are men in their early forties, who pick fights with the old guard of their parties to flaunt their ‘modernising’ credentials. But politics in Britain and Sweden are as different now as they were in the 1980s, except the roles are reversed. Sweden is the unlikely champion of supply-side economics, with ideas too radical for Brits. There is cross-party support in Sweden for profit-seeking state schools, which Michael Gove won’t attempt. Borg’s tax-cutting policy was accompanied by a 268-page book explaining the dynamic link between lower taxes and more jobs. Such a document would be unthinkable from HM Treasury.
HERO posts big blind of $5.00
Speaking of tat, is this not the most disturbing thing you have ever witnessed in your life? It will haunt my dreams forever. Why?? Why, I ask you?
But, a difficult period featuring draws against Malaga, Villarreal and Valencia helped the Catalans back in the title hunt as they closed the gap to just four points at the top.
Distance to the mic is extremely important because our ears relate distance to the intimacy
Oh, and Limp Bizkit were there too...
This illustration is taken from a complete Westinghouse-AEC-Duquesne Light Company press release package that was released prior to the dedication of the Shippingport plant (which took place in May, 1958). The details are clearly marked.
Pix, courtesy of The People’s Parliament
Let me know if you are seriously considering this and I can probably swing the best possible deal.
19th. I came in 19th in my age group. And there was close to 300 people in my age group. not just 20. I am stoked. And I have a huge #Runboner (thanks to OUAL for that awesome term)
One of my favorite tastes of Paris is Poilâne Bakery. It is not far from l’Alliance, where I took French classes each day all day until I had exhausted every class you could take, and I remember my initial trepidation at ordering a simple loaf of bread in the bustling shop. It is also steps from one of my favorite décor shops, Mis en Demeure. Among the lovelies of Poilâne at lunchtime you can get a toasted open face sandwich called a “Tartine,” with various toppings, and often with a luscious French cheese. Their large classic loaf is a whole wheat sourdough, with just the right amount of tang and simple, natural ingredients. It’s what the French call “Bread, the old way,” before yeast. The patriarche of the company was later killed in a helicopter crash with his wife, and the tradition is carried on by their daughter, Apollonia. I could go on for an hour about Poilâne but will stop there. Don’t visit Paris without a stop and the purchase of bread to take home or perhaps a sachet of punitions….
As Georgia’s chief executive, I competed with other governors to reduce our prison populations. We classified all new inmates to prepare them for a productive time in prison, followed by carefully monitored early-release and work-release programs. We recruited volunteers from service clubs who acted as probation officers and “adopted” one prospective parolee for whom they found a job when parole was granted. At that time, in the 1970s, only 1 in 1,000 Americans was in prison.
Brilliant ideas, ground down by cash and conformity
I'm sorry if you're waiting for the next episode and promise to get round to it ASAP.
Life is a Game Play it.
Nay, if the gentle spirit of moving words
“The King will reply, ‘I tell you the truth, whatever you did for one of the least of these brothers of mine, you did for me.” Matthew 25:40
Coni and I were riding fence one spring day checking to make sure the fence was intact ( the horses lived in a 25 acre pasture), when we had to cross a creek that ran through our pasture, somehow she stumbled and I was thrown forward over her head, into the water and was instantly submerged with a horse coming down upon me, somehow Coni avoided crushing me under her by curling her forelegs up and jumping forward, it was a miracle I wasn't drowned with a horse on top of me, but she knew it was me under her legs and wasn't going to hurt me.
My poor stepdad was still sitting across from me and asked who was that? I told him it was another of Rob’s ladies and my stepdad who never swore said “Are they assholes???”. It made me laugh hearing that from him, but I said yes obviously they both are and obviously neither of them has a brain combined between the two of them to be calling with such outrageous requests.
Again, to make the best use of vacation time, preparation is vital. Though it is a sacrifice of time (and for me, sanity too, as I get overwhelmed with all the information I'm reading), it's worth it not to have wasted time while on vacation, trying to figure out what to do next.
And with a lovely prize of a choice of three of the images used by the Design Team, this week, for our randomly chosen winner, what's there to lose?...haaa!
Croatia’s Seven that Spells rockets off with a precision take on “The Eleven”
The story begins with a single mother in financial desperation who gives away one of her newly born twin sons and attempts to keep them from discovering one another’s true identity. However, their lives become linked and her secrecy leads them to a tragic ending.
ALLL DAY
IN MEDIUM BOWL, whisk together remaining wet ingredients
Here is my office! I am so, so, so excited about having an office of my own!! I never thought I would be a working mom so I never thought we needed an office! It just happened and I have to say that it was one of the best decisions that I ever made!!! Before this, I had a laptop and several traveling office bins for my paperwork and supplies. One of the good things about my business is that I don’t carry any inventory or need that much space so that worked fine for me. I still don’t really need this much space but I will take it, lol!! I also can’t wait to fill the walls with cute photos for inspiration!
Lastly, but certainly not least, was my hero, Lynessa, who painstakingly added all my photos to our journal each day, since my iPad did not support that feature. Some days, I downloaded and sent over 30 photos, which would pop into our online album the very next day, thanks to Lynessa! Even during the Missoula snowstorm, it took her only 36 hours to get back on track at the office...amazing!
The court order barring me from the internets expired recently, so I thought I would resume posting. Perhaps by now longtime readers have come to their senses and no one will care anymore.
I used Hazel and nutty from Sugar Nellie, and coloured it using my promrkers. I glamour dusted her wings and added rock candy stockles to her skirt, before distressing the image. The dp is Basic Grey Payrus, and that has also been distressed. I added an embossed flower with a blingy brad, some seam binding and double loop bow, and some pearls.
The change was not too hard, since I had plenty of vegetarian options that I found enjoyable to eat. The only problem that I could see in the future would be having multiple options for dishes. I have never eaten vegetarian before, so my knowledge of dishes is limited. I have been going online to find new dishes for the next two weeks, but I feel like I might be repeating dishes multiple times.
9:15 am. I feel so privileged to be taking a class with the person who invented this knitting technique. And hey, at least I can be pretty sure that no one else in this class has done this before either.
and tongued is crust of brine, my soul departed
And thay"s when it happened
A Boy and His Dog (1975) is the touching tale of the undying bond between man and man’s best friend. Kind of. In the distant future (post-apocalyptic, of course) Vic (Don Johnson) and his telepathic dog Blood (voiced by Tim McIntire) search for food and females. The landscape is reminiscent of Hell Comes to Frogtown, but it was actually Mad Max who was inspired first. A Boy and His Dog was directed by L.Q. Jones (the old, blonde, mustachioed guy in The Mask of Zorro) and is appropriately taglined as “a rather kinky tale of survival.” The protagonist, Vic, is not only a bit of an immature, reckless jerk, but he’s also a bit of a rapist too. The dog is ten times smarter than Vic is, which really makes you consider a dog’s steadfast loyalty in a whole new light. When Vic meets Quilla June Holmes (Susanne Benton) he is convinced he must see the strange, enigmatic underground city. If everyone above ground is wild and dangerous and resources are scarce then maybe it’s time to go subterranean. The problem is that Blood is wounded and so he elects to wait for Vic to return up top. Once underground Vic discovers a whole populated world of people wearing clown makeup (and the world is run by Jason Robards!!!). He then learns that they need his seed to repopulate (Frogtown! Confound you!). Initially the idea appeals to the perpetually randy Vic, but when they take all the fun out of it and keep him prisoner that’s when things get serious. I would love to tell you more, but I can’t ruin it for you. It’s a pretty odd film that gets away with a lot of its shenanigans by not taking itself too seriously. Oh, and the ending is definitely one for the books.
plot line is coming together. I even have something of a sub-plot. I think I've rinsed away the dregs of my last novel from my mind, leaving a sparkly, shiny space for the new one. Yet I faff, and I sigh, and I dream, and I plan. When will I make the leap from my head to the page? Do I wait for the characters to speak to me? I don't think I should. I think it's only by nudging them onto the
These things I have spoken to you while remaining with you; and if you fail to
Questions :
Solvang understands its sweet-tooth tourists. They’ve created the Sweet Treats Trail map (http://www.solvang100.com/sweet-treats-trail-map-Solvang.pdf) for people who want to systematically wrap themselves in decadent goodness. I was seduced by both Ingeborg’s World Famous Danish Chocolates (http://www.ingeborgs.com/) and Rocky Mountain Chocolate Factory (https://rockymountainchocolatefactory.com/). Their inventory and styles are different enough that you really should check out both (also, the ice cream was pretty tempting at Ingeborg’s). I picked up a little bit of everything from mocha bars to truffles. I pondered the sugar free cases in both shops, but it just seemed like cheating.
Now, no one believes us, how beautiful it was here, ha, ha
Comments were requested from the Attorney Generals’ offices in NY, CA, NV, and MA and the White House, but no comment was provided.
Everything may be plain for me as of the moment but with the way my sister talks, it’s as if a beautiful garden has already been finished. She saw everything before they come into reality. In our lives it is a good habit to visualize a project or a venture before starting it. It is very vital. What do we want to finish? What results do we want to have? It is “Starting with the end in mind.” In doing so, we will be inspired and motivated to finish the project.
So, for those businesses that compete on price as their primary “marketing” strategy, take note: price is your race to the bottom.
This week, I will feature both so you can understand why these two companies, make our cut. For Root it is quality, variety and value for me!
I hate that fucking sliding scale. I know that every time someone remarks on how smart he is, there is that silent for a hearing impaired child. I don't want lowered expectations for my son. I want him to be popular and Homecoming King and all that bullshit.
The crux of it all.
Who is the angel of the Lord?
Sadie Ette, 36, New York, N.Y.
However the protesters persevered , the egyptians showed great unity, great patriotism and great strength of character and today unexpectedly the resignation was announced, the freedom received, the impossible achieved.
I handed him a snickerdoodle and hoped we were even.
So with the night light on next to the bed, the room was bathed in subtle warm yellow light and soft music playing on the CD player. I closed my eyes and began to breathe deeply and visualize erotic and the view she had of me. It was a very sexual and sensual setting. My cock went from semi hard to steely erect even before she touched me.
Glassware: Pint Glass or Snifter
Happy Monday! Whew! It is quite warm and muggy today and at the moment, it feels like we might have some thunderstorms. I have a mental note as to which windows I have open in case I have to close them :)
I discovered The Littles one weekend while reading over my brother's shoulder. Every Friday like clockwork, he made a run to our elementary school library and would return home with many lovely tales. He would always share his booty of books with his little sister who increasingly became addicted to this weekend escapist ritual. He was my supplier.
Anyway, I asked Kristin to share her thoughts on design school. What she's learned. What her key takeaways have been. Without further ado - from Kristin:
“For with God nothing is ever impossible and no word from God shall be without power or impossible of fulfillment.” Luke 1:37
While the current trends are a significant pointer to how new developments are taking place, what breathes a new life in the moribund system is that voters have become acutely aware of their role, rights and responsibilities. For far too long have they seen the divisive forces acting in the name of religion, caste and creed, the end-result of which is that the elite of political class have been garnering all the fruits of power for themselves leaving the people out in the cold once the elections are over and results declared. While the minorities continue to be in a sorry plight, the unfortunate among the majorities too feel cheated of a fair and due share of the cake. A British political scientist is credited with the view that elections are the best cleansing agent. Without it, there would be so much muck around as to choke the springs of democracy. The silent prayer of the Indian electorate has more or less always been: May the best one win! We desperately need a detergent like the one which washes the whitest as in the TV commercial ads proliferating by the day.
Only animals with owners have any hope, and even then it is slim. If residents suspect their pet has been snatched by the MSPCA, they can come to the pound and pay a ransom to rescue it. But the charge is £30, which is beyond the reach of most people, as the average worker earns less than £60 a month.
Shield Boosts increase the size of your invincible energy shield, allowing more asteroids to be destroyed at once. Concussion Bombs obliterate every nearby asteroid. Stasis Fields slow the incoming asteroids down. Ship Repairs regenerate health to your spaceship. The bonus items are clearly thought out, and provide exactly what was needed to allow serious players to achieve higher and higher scores. And that’s not all… this credible media outlet has it on reliable sources that an impending features update is about to launch with even more purchasable power-ups, that you can launch from a gorgeous new ship model!!! How amazing is that, it’s like the developers were reading my mind!
Will: the big ones!
At the Free Fringe, no hard-earned money is wasted. If you don’t like the show, you don’t give (and often you sneak out early, thus leaving an audience who is on the wavelength of the show). If you do like the show, you don’t have to give either. Some don’t. Most do. The choice to give or not is always theirs.
Personally, I wouldn’t quite agree that Islam was the first community to allow divorce without grounds, but I’d be willing to believe they were the first community to codify it – from the historical records, it seems to have happened in the Byzantine world, as well, but it wasn’t written as law there.
We are in the ring, ready for our main event. Joe and Magnus come out, and we see the challengers come out too.
One on my girls wrote they following:
I finished my July design for the monthly QAL at Sandy's Quilt Shop! I'm really happy with the finished mini quilt. I'll share the pattern with all of you in July in case you'd like to make you're own.
In any case, most of the methods for reducing greenhouse gas emissions involve increasing our energy efficiency and stimulating development of new forms of energy -- things we ought to be doing anyway to remain competitive and current in an ever-changing global economy.
4. BEAUTIFUL SHOW in Singapore
Wait, hold up, I have one more thing. The term fag hag just does not work for the lesbian community, in my humble opinion. Lesbros is cool, but it’s still not quite right and Dutch Boys? Again, I don’t even understand what that means. Why doesn’t it work? Well, the term fag HAG – too negative. She hangs around fags and she’s a hag. Sorry, but part of that term is saying – she’s an ugly witch and no straight dude would ever want her. Nope, I don’t think that’s totally true. It’s a snap judgement and therefore, probably more indicative of the bitchy queen that made it up more than anything else. I’m the owner of my own life-time-vag, so I think it’s only fair that I get to make up the term. Plus, a person who hangs out with another person AND either a) doesn’t want to make sexies with them or b) has too many insecurities to find a similar person of the opposite sex – well, they have enough problems without also calling them ugly to boot.
Of his few songs under the dangerous sky.
Type one body paragraph of your essay on the hero’s journey.
To prepare myself for crafting personal essays, memoirs and other works of creative nonfiction, I have been reading and sifting through The Best American Essays of 2011 and Telling True Stories.
* 1 1/2 teaspoons curry powder, divided
However, to be honest, I had more fun on “Grease.” Why? Because it was simply amazing!!! It was so cool to see how your colleagues dance and act professionally. My friend and I were pointing at some people all the time: “See, this is Gergana!” or “Hey, isn’t that Mariya?” In addition to the good performance of the actors, we really enjoyed comparing the stage version of the musical to the actual movie that we had seen for like a thousand times. I can say that the 12 leva I paid for my seats at the musical were the most reasonably spent money ever!
Furthermore, wanting to see your candidate win is not a bad thing or a sell-out, it’s the chance to actually bring about change instead of being sidelined from the decision-making. Accusing those who want to vote strategically of not being part of the “positivity posse,” is a pretty shallow argument.
with a dusty rag,
Of Magnus Martyr hold
Therefore, treatments for impotence, including CIALIS, should not be found in men with heart disease for whom sexual intercourse is inadvisable. The following sets of patients with heart related illnesses were not included in clinical studies:
Littlehampton United Church
When we drove up to the customs lady we nervously explained the whole story, she said that actually happens frequently. Part of Point Roberts even though being part of the states is on our side and still divided by water from the rest of the states. You can accidentally get into Point Roberts sometimes although only if you go through a fenced barred off area "OOPs AGAIN" but there is no access from Point Roberts to the rest of the states without going through a customs checkpoint. She accepted my license but also sent us for what I had feared a search of our belongings and vehicle. I was so worried about what they would do to Jack in his urn.
I'm going to make another for next Spring/Summer. Most others seemed to make their dresses in pretty colours, I had this (boring) brown patterned fabric already in the cupboard and thought with a cardigan and boots might be alright for the cooler weather.
She couldn’t believe what he was saying. Nothing was further from the truth. “Do you think I would have sunk so much of my savings into that house just to abandon it? I would never, ever do what you’re saying. But if circumstances changed, I would expect you to support what was best for our family. Couples who are committed make sacrifices for each other!”
and i admit that it's all my fault *.*
The text emphasises the emotional nature of the images themselves. His father at times looks lost or frightened. He has expressed his wish to die, he says “it is time to go” and “I have been around too long”. Clearly these are feelings that the subject would find it difficult to express to anyone in whom he had less than absolute trust – the trust that comes from a loving family relationship with the photographer.
Winged ants and gall gnats, which have survived unchanged for 25 million years, demolish the claims of the theory of evolution.
Sure enough, the wind at the start was NW, but the velocity was closer to 8-10 knots. But before we could start, a bit of complication started unfolding. A Port Orchard Yacht club member left the yacht club with the temporary buoy to set at Battle Pt and to shorten the course if necessary. He did not get very far before his motor overheated and he went dead in the water. One of his relatives was starting in the cruising division ten minutes before us. He took the buoy with the assumption that he would be the first boat to Battle Point and he would set the buoy. Stay tuned!
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing. Charity suffereth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity vaunteth not itself, is not puffed up,
In the meantime, you can add their real names to your pleas to the universe on our behalf, stitched so lovingly onto two beautiful Curious George quilts handmade by a wonderful fellow IF friend and IRL friend from my childhood. First names given by us, second names their beautiful Ethiopian names that will forever be a part of them.
Strengths: This was a really good skateboarding story. Jordy's relationship with Ali is real and sweet-- just what the boys want. Not mushy at all. The skate boarding details are good, and the contest is a much better plot line than "people don't want a skate park". Need more books like this!
54 automata
I've had the sort of week when the grey storm clouds gather overhead, when life seems harsh and unfair, and full of worries. Even little disappointments sting, let alone the big ones.
of miraculous intimacy
This is an example of an excellent promotion targeted at housewives. This is a very ambitious promotion as this Horlicks jug involves changing all the existing ground rules. There are a lot of changes required like the factories are requried to fill a glass jug rather than the usual bottle requiring change in production processes. The whole logistics are to be changed as the jugs require larger cases for transit. The jugs occupy more space in the shelf, and has to be negotiated with the retailer.
We had quite a week of weather... after talking about how we were having nice spring weather last week - on Monday we had some wintery weather again. Freezing rain, accompanied by a power outtage. The power was out from 10:45am until like 6 or 7 at night, which was no fun as the day got colder and colder... by the end of the night, i ended up driving the boys around in the van because our house was cold. How fun. It was an adventure - as we drove around the city the roads and driving conditions got worse and worse... oh man. good times.... we're good now, though. Sunny days, sweeping the clouds away and all that.
"EZ" by Pete Yorn - Major crush material here. I believe I've said before that Yorn's looks were the inspiration for the character of Baker, my folk-singing spirit guide in my GAYBIE AWARD-WINNING book Woke Up in a Strange Place.
DON’T: Eat smelly food at your desk… a salad is okay, a roast dinner probably is not!
Christopher Marley sums up the thread of current design with this statement: "My chief objective in working with obscure organisms is to foster a deeper appreciation of the masterful design found everywhere in the natural world." Indigenous tribes are able to preserve their lands and ecosystems, through the collection and selling of their abundant insect populations. We think they are glorious!
1. LeBron James vs Carmelo Anthony
See that big smile above? That's my reward. I want to know that he smiles because of me (not frowns because of me), I want to know that he is happier for marrying me and that he doesn't regret the decision he made to spend the rest of his life with ME!
But it makes for good TV, right? Right.
This latest interpretation seems to be correct. As per Indian Law, choreographic work forms a part of dramatic work and hence, can be said to share it characteristics. U.S. Law however, treats choreographic work separately from dramatic work. This suggests that the inclusion of ‘choreographic work’ as a separate right is intended to ensure a wider interpretation of the term. Keeping this in mind, the case of Horgan
Hugs and love to you all tonight. Sending a wish to all of you for peace, love and lots of smiles!
Prepares Your will for me
I was laughing the whole time – especially when I explained that ‘sin city’ would overtake me if I tried to live in Vegas and Jesus might not approve. The boys agreed God is beyond good and I should stay working for Him.
For a person you never wished for let alone expected
Envy is right behind Pride in being the true engine of Las Vegas, Sin City. Smaller and smaller bikinis are donned, to the point of them not being worn at all in the topless pools, because the race is on not for enjoyment of the sun on bare skin but for who can take it all off!, shake the most junk in the trunk, or be the most outrageous and outlandish and garner the most stares from the men who pay $20 or more to attend the topless pools to watch such antics, which predictably go down, every day, all day. If you’re wondering why I went to the topless pool, it was to see what went on there and my prediction was thoroughly fulfilled, and because I knew it would be quieter as no kids are allowed there. The beach chairs were of higher quality, there was more space, and it is even better situated to the sun than the family pool (which is also enormous and loud). I enjoy a topless sunbathe whenever I can, but I was not interested in joining this race so I kept my top on. I’ll find a quiet and secluded beach where removing my top is about being closer to the sun and the earth and all that is divine about our world, and feeling that bake through my skin, not about being closer to a guest spot on Girls Gone Wild.
Cause joy and peace he brings
This is why adolescents have such a strong need for belonging. Their new sense of separation makes them feel so vulnerable that they need to reinforce their identity by being a part of groups or gangs, or by following fashions. More bleakly, this is also why most murders are committed by young men, in response to perceived slights or insults. With their new fragile sense of identity, young men are liable to take offense at any kind of trivial affront, making them feel belittled and creating an instant desire to take revenge and regain their lost status.
was amazing. Now it has become my favorite event
Monday - Goth is explaining the basic principles of communication
Greenwich Market has a roof.
The photo that now appears in my header was taken in the early spring of 1976. Since the name of my blog makes a reference to my background as a juggler, I decided that I would add the personal touch with a photo of me related to juggling. Today I will explain what this photo represents.
Mix in oil and warm water, forms into soft dough.
Why can’t you find comfort in my kiss
While land and water managers share overarching goals for the region—the conservation of species and the preservation of a way of life— federal agencies can be better partners to local communities by more thoroughly coordinating investments and authorities and by working with partners to describe a more cohesive landscape-scale conservation vision. Our focus in 2012 will be on strengthening that coordination where it exists and working across agencies and with partners to define a shared vision to anchor coordinated action in the years to come.
With an electric mixer, beat heavy cream, sour cream, and brown sugar to stiff peaks. Split each shortcake in half, using a serrated knife, and place the bottoms onto individual plates. Spoon some fruit onto the bottoms of each shortcake, top with the whipped cream, and cap with the shortcake tops. Serve.
Check out what's new at Gift Baskets by Design. Angie Wilson from Gift Baskets by Design has some new and wonderful products in her store. She is more than just gift baskets. There are wonderful products you can get from Angie on their own, without being in a basket.
Ed Murray, local on-air personality, is the emcee of the event. Special escorts from The Thunder will escort models during a unique fashion show by Sherri Hill, international designer of celebrity and pageant gowns.
1 bathtub
If you need to cook up something quick, this recipe is for you. Great finger food for party or to eat with rice! Kids will like it!
Apparently she was at some craft fair that day and came across this rock that had a little raccoon painted on it and she thought to herself What a perfect gift to commemorate a 30th birthday! I'll bet she doesn't have one of these. And you know what? She was right.
Favorite New NYC Food Market: An Italian mecca in New York City, Eataly addresses all of your needs, from cookbooks to fresh fish, from cheese to fresh pasta. You can shop for all your home cooking needs, or dine at their numerous restaurants. Where else will you find a vegetarian butcher? There is little Italian you won't find here, but because of its huge popularity, it might be easier to venture there during off hours.
My friendship with Leah deepened over time as it grew into one that sustained and nourished us both. Leah’s children were older than mine, but we shared the children’s activities, birthdays, and school performances whenever we could. We exchanged babysitting, enabling my husband and me to get out once in a while and Leah to begin dating. When Leah remarried, we continued to share couple and family activities, but she and I never gave up the times set aside for just the two of us, time spent at movies and plays, in bookstores and gardens.
It's very different from NaNoWriMo. Instead of focusing on a huge number of words in 30 days, the idea is to develop long term writing habits that take into account that most of us have lives we can't bail on. As it was described, NaNo is like a sprint, but writing a novel is more like a marathon. And many people, including myself, cannot write quickly or consistently.
I loved the designs on each of the double-sided textured cardstocks.
He told Me they were the keepers of the story, telling generation after generation the legends and history of the Forest.
Before I leave you with these pictures I want to mention that (the little town of) Bethlehem is about 10 minutes drive to the south of where I live. Some accounts speculate that what the Magi (the three wise men/Kings) actually saw in the sky may have been Jupiter. They came from the east and so they were looking west. Jupiter to the left of the moon would look like it was pointing south of Jerusalem (earlier in the evening than when I took this photo). Reader, I didn't follow the star.
- There is no way to look at today's outing by Joaquin Benoit's and not be concerned. Tigers manager Jim Leyland should strongly consider flipping roles and making Octavio Dotel their primary setup man.
One of the place Diane loves to travel to is Australia. They have friends in the Navy there and while visiting she attended a quilt guild. There she met a lady who's husband had received a QOV, and the challenge was on to cover their own!. This was in 2009, and this last January she traveled down under again, and helped them set up a QOV system like we have here.
Our country national debt is £4.6 trillion. We can only pay off this debt if we generate new industries in our country. The cuddly toy moon landing project will produce the new industies that our country needs. With new supersonic engines and super conductor computers, we will be selling “Made in UK” products all over the world.
Even if you’re cagey, and know all the tricks the Barrys send down the wire, and keep yourself hull down when the flak starts, guess what? You didn’t keep yourself running green by being all smiles and handshakes, did you? You violated regs, and violations rate blackers. One blacker, one more year on the contract. You cack a guy you shouldn’t? Blacker. You bitch-chat a Barry? Blacker. You evac on a mission? Blacker. I’ve been CFC-ed to the Interstellar Mining Consortium for eight years running, and got me two years left. Only one guy been here longer than me, and that’s Vivian. He’s rated sixteen blackers in his time, and run twelve of his twenty-one years. Nobody else has lived that long. Nobody.
*Turning my phone off and completely ignoring all my calls and texts
1. Demand that council reduce spending by reducing staff in all areas of public employees including police, fire and EMS. Freeze all hiring across the board including part-timers and occasional staff. Specifically, demand all departments to reduce staff in two stages: Three percent in the first six months of 2012 and four percent in the last six months of the year. Total 105 employees.
When Captain James Cook and the Endeavour arrived at the island in April 1769, those who had visited previously immediately noticed that something untoward had happened.
As everyone knows I receive Scripture emails everyday. Before, I went to bed I was looking through the Holy Bible. I was in Matthew as I came across something about the Beatitudes. It was on that same page that it had the talk about the narrow gate.
“when you are persecuted in one town, run away to another. yes indeed; I tell you, you will not finish going through the towns of Isra’el before the son of man comes.” (Matthew 10:23 CJB)
HENRY JAGLOM: Yeah, and it's very rewarding to me. To see A SAFE PLACE getting this DVD release proves all the critic's wrong that trashed it when it first came out. I mean it got attacked. I can remember the New York Times or Time Magazine said the film looked like it had been tossed in the air and landed in a mix master. They said it made no sense. When really, I had a very clear and precise vision for that film. I was trying to play with conventional film structure. I was playing with daydream and fact, illusion and reality, and the emotions of past, present, and future. I didn't wanna give it any type of conventional line, meaning why follow the tradition of where something begins and ends. The film was a failure, and people stayed away from it. It did get a great notice from Anais Nin however.
H - Good! I’ve set the posts up, so all you have to do is to press a button. Can you manage that?
Another writing project.
This news video also demonstrates different reporting techniques used in a news package. You hear the reporter give the report in a voiceover. Giving context to clips of quotes from persons of interest to the story. In between clips of persons of interest, clips of scenes relevant to the story or b-roll is edited in not only to give the viewer something to look at but also to provide more context to the story.
both real and imaginary, that I'm not really a
Since then, however, an appellate court has unanimously backed a lower court's finding that the ESD essentially misled the public by failing to study the community impacts of a 25-year project buildout, and has ordered the agency to conduct a Supplemental Environmental Impact Statement.
Once, when I was touring the country with a traveling stage show, I was backstage talking with the custodian at a school where we were performing. He was telling me about some of the various entertainers who had performed there in the past and about some of their behavior. According to this custodian's words, the worst groups that came to play in this auditorium had been the southern gospel groups. He said that they behaved awfully and left all sorts of trash including many beer cans behind.
The use of blood is symbolic: it represents life and holiness. The high Priest, through the performance of the ritual, brings purification and holiness to the inner-most region of the Tabernacle, the sanctuary, moving outwards to the courtyard.
You ever have one of those days where everything just goes wrong?
The reason is that OPEC countries produce almost nothing but oil. Their population is growing by leaps and bounds, and because Saudis pay no income tax, the House of Saud will need more and more money to keep its citizens happy, and avoid the fate of toppled leaders in Libya, Egypt and elsewhere.
It seems we’ve been tagged in a post from some friends of ours, The Dogs of Beer. They want to know a bit more about us, so you get to learn a little more too! Without further ado, I give you the opportunity to learn a little more about the both of us!
(6) Numbers 6:24-26 is a blessing that essentially consists of the three-fold repetition of the name of Yahweh. It is inserted into the narrative of the law-giving at Sinai, but its actual source is much more likely to have been in the services at Solomon’s Temple before the Exile. The language of the covenant-renewal ceremony in Joshua 24:14-24 seems to have come from an annual ceremony of that sort held at Shechem. This is preceded in 24:2-13 by a historical recital, itself a traditional form. as we can see by looking at Deuteronomy 6:20-25 or I Samuel 12:6-15. The historical recital (to which we have already referred is an expanded version of the prologue that traditionally given a pact or covenant, known technically as a “suzerainty treaty,” between a ruler and his people.
And Lilla as She-Ra for Halloween. Pretty simple to throw together....although finding the elusive second hand boots to coat in gold was a little tricky. All worth it for hearing Lilla comment with a dazed look in her eyes: "I can't believe I'm She-Ra." She's definitely striking a serious pose here:
THE BLAME GAME
Many of the sights and sounds of the city that weekend have followed me. Waiting in the long trailing queue for the Eiffel Tower, with numb feet in silly footwear, followed by the exhilaration of the tiny glass elevator, lifting us higher and unbelievably higher into Paris’ atmosphere. At the top, straining my delighted eyes to view the horizon, over a dazzling, neverending Paris as far as the eye could see.
I have to admit it, I'm an addict to mini desserts, pies, cake pops, donuts, cakes, cookies, you name it. Whenever I see them I go crazy just because they are the perfect bite size, they look really cute and besides they won't make me gain weight, right? for being small?
Whistled, and beat their wings
Time to complete: 8 hours
Annie called her at work and said she was Olga Sokolov from Public Health.
now I just realized this post is stupid - no spammer is going to explain this to me LOL..so guess this is a "Vent Here" post ...
was not enough.
FINISH® QUANTUM® utilizes a breakthrough multi-chamber technology that releases each agent when needed during the cycle. With Finish Quantum, you no longer have to worry about water marks on newly washed dishes!
Victor Moore Make Way for Tomorrow
“For almost as long as our nation has existed, man has gazed upon a map of the eastern United States and dreamed of traveling to Cleveland, the largest metropolitan area in Ohio,” NASA administrator Charles F. Bolden, Jr. said at a press conference announcing the agency’s first major initiative since the discontinuation of the space shuttle program. “Until now, the immense physical and psychological risks involved in any manned mission had put that dream sadly out of reach.”
facilities (about 27 schools) are all whole grain, and have fresh
Breakfast: protein, fruit, (grains)
and now I'm playing with layout. I do believe this is my first foray into triangles and HSTs! (Love this next photo... can you see that I'm a very messy quilter? Also, I've pretty much taken over the kitchen as my sewing space. Hubby LOVES that.) ;)
As I watched the latest debate on CNN this week, I saw how this field of candidates might operate in a newspaper newsroom. So here are the Republican contenders, recast in their roles as editors:
“No, no don’t do that.” I whispered.
Well, thank goodness for small favors.
Revelation 10
So my final recipe for the year is Cranberry Snowdrift Bars. I saw this on Jane's blog & bookmarked it since then. Finally I managed to bake it. There are three layers, the rich crust, the tart cranberry filling & the snowy meringue. These bars are really delicious. The only change I would make the next time I bake it is I would reduce the filling to, perhaps, 3/4 or 1/2 cup. I thought the filling was too thick. One more thing, the baking temperature & time below should only be a guide. You really need to check now & then. With my oven, I only needed to bake for about 20 minutes for each layer.
One of the things that was hard for me, as I remember now, was that I was the one whose life was uprooted the most. My dad and I moved into Tracy’s home and I had to switch schools in the middle of 5th grade. Everything was new to me. And, to make matters worse my mom moved out of state for a while so all responsibility was on Tracy to take care of me.
Keziah left her career in the criminal justice system to live in the beautiful Blue Mountains and spend as much time as she can crafting her evocative, erotic stories. Please join me in welcoming her to the blog today.
Just because the word dora existed in telugu from times immemorial in our literature etc… does not mean that the British ruled India from then. It does not mean that telugu literature is the work of white men.
Serve hot over rice or bread. Enjoy! =)
My return was a jubilee. And while I am not proud of the woman I was before Christ, I am forgiven. When I accepted His wounds and scars; He forgave me. He wiped my slate clean. He bathed me in His grace.
So, tonight when I made the mac and cheese I did a boxed Kraft one instead of making it as normal. I used the Kraft Homestyles one that they came out with fairly recently.
Yes, I finally altered some snap clips... (ignore the line of buttons on the back clip; that was just an experiment). I made these fabulous ribbon roses from a tutorial at Really Reasonable Ribbon's Ramblings. I kind of like hair accessories and keep buying them from everywhere; I'd been wanting barrettes/snaps with flowers for a long time now but every time I saw one, I'd think I could try making it myself. And when I saw the rose tutorial, I knew where my first rose would go. This was just the thing I wanted! :-)
Dirty Rotten Scoundrels Dvdrip
Ethan Kent knew Riley had the talent and the drive to make it as a singer. He also knew she wasn’t going anywhere if she stayed in their nowhere town for him. Then one night and one huge mistake sent her running on the road to fame. Which doesn’t mean he ever stopped loving her…
Skip to content Home & News WebMD Home WebMD News Home Free Health Newsletters Health A-Z ADD/ADHD Allergies Alzheimer’s Anxiety Disorders Arthritis Asthma Back Pain Bipolar Disorder Breast Cancer Cancer Carpal Tunnel Syndrome Cholesterol Cold & Flu Colorectal Cancer COPD Depression Diabetes Erectile Dysfunction Eye Health Fibromyalgia Heart Disease Heartburn/GERD Herpes HPV/Genital Warts Hypertension IBS Incontinence/OAB Inflammatory Bowel Lupus
Regular and Herb. These crackers are similar size to a Wheat Thin, a little thicker but not as dense. I haven’t had Special K in a while, but I don’t think they taste like what I recall. To be perfectly honest, the first time I tried regular, I didn’t like it, but it mostly was about it not being what I expected. It’s cracker shaped, but texture is not cracker like. That said, they grew on me, and I enjoyed them after the initial trial.
WHEN: Sunday, Dec. 18 - 2:00 PM - Play-offs - four teams 3:00 PM - Finals - two teams -
swallowing the Norwegian wind
and her innocence a heralder’s beacon.
He therefore that will be saved: must think thus of the Trinity.
Their team suffers a disadvantage which is unique in world football, with FIFA decreeing that players born in Northern Ireland can play for either Irish squad.
1 weapon--they
One blow was all it took. The glowing orb erupted into pulverized glints of light, all of which faded to nothing upon hitting the ground.
She writes of stereotypes about boys and girls and how some mothers long for daughters so they can develop close relationships with them. In some cases (like mine), feminists look forward to raising strong women who have opportunities they or their mothers did not have. As one mom said, "When it came time to have children, what I had in mind were daughters. All of my feminist friends laughed, 'Look at the hand you were dealt.' I had to process that loss. I had daughter envy." Why do women assume that girls will be more emotionally available than boys? We make assumptions that boys will grow apart from their mothers, based on culturally acceptable mother-son norms.
In conjunction with that show I can also be found this Saturday evening down at the Jordan Schnitzer Museum of Art here in Eugene doing airbrush demos and letting people draw or color their own superheroes. Don't miss it! Nov. 7th from 5:30 to 6:30 pm.
1- Be organized:
Score: 1 / 5
I was chatting in IRC with a friend from a forum I belong to, and he sent me this link that he thought would peak my interest. He was indeed correct! The link contained an article written by Petter C. Beller of http://www.forbes.com/ on July 6th, 2009. The title is Female Gamers on the Rise. Ok. I think I’ll give this a read even though it’s rather short. Little did I know that I would be marking this article up and down with a pen like a graduate student taking notes for their thesis. Now, I do feel that I’m slightly biased when I reviewed this article as I am not your typical female, and I’ve been playing video games for twenty one years. I still figured I would share my initial feelings when I read it.
Another yellow Post-It note in Writer informs me that I may not want to refer to Rammy as being an angel this early in the story, that I may want to keep an ‘air of mystery’ longer. After reading that note I immediately thought to myself, ‘then why did you title the chapter so, dumbarse?’ Then I read the second part of the yellow Post-It note which said, ‘also, note the chapter’s title.’ Yeah, so whose the dumabarse now, future-self?
10. Feelin' Stronger Everyday 8:37
“This particular thunderstorm developed over the northern part of Wiltshire, and then gradually over the next three hours that storm tracked through Oxfordshire and into part of Buckinghamshire before eventually dying out before it got to Cambridgeshire.”
For a snack before we left. I ate a thinkthin bar. I know I said I was going to do the cleanse but I figured I couldn’t do it this weekend because I forgot I had a few things going on.
It says on the bottle "ages well", so I bought another to drink sometime next year to see if it will get any better, but this blog will probably be long dead by then.
Beat the egg whites, with a pinch of salt, until stiff peaks form. Gently fold the egg whites into the flour mixture. Fold in the poppy seeds. Pour the batter in a greased loaf tin and bake for 45-50 minutes or until a toothpick inserted in the center of the cake comes out clean.
Artists: Jim Balent and Kim DeMulder
While CB Pride sits 'not in good standing' with Government, due to their apparent failure to file their Annual Return, (while under your watch, I might add), St. John's Pride Inc. appears to be doing very well and has adapted excellently, though this transition of leadership! While relationships between myself and the new directors may not be the greatest, I can sleep well at night knowing that I put the organization and it's community members ahead of myself and my 'pride'. Whether my replacements succeed or fail, I know I did everything I could to set them up for success.
they borrowed it from some other culture. The wheel appears to have been first used in Sumer in the Middle East around 3500 BC, whence it spread across Europe, Asia, and North Africa. It didn't arrive in Britain until 500 BC. An article in Scientific American points out that the problem isn't with designing a wheel (which was done in neolithic times for what appear to be children's toys). The problem was designing an axle:
"yes and I flushed it"
"I am therefore convinced that 'worked in the territory of India" means manufactured to a reasonable extent in India."
Guy Fawkes, Guy Fawkes, t'was his intent
It is now day number 412 of my captivity, I am now owned by five of them. They see my every move. They haunt my steps. My sleep is only at their will and my days are run by their feeding schedule. I am lost. Send help. Send. The. Dog…
Think about this, what if you had no idea how to use a computer, you would have no idea how to get online, that’s means you could never google anything, never check your emails, you could never pay those bills that realistically you wouldn’t get time to do during the day, come on now who is seriously going to go and stand in a queue at the bank or the post office. If you never got online you wouldn’t be able to send a poke on Facebook, or check your tweets. How would you know what’s going on with your friends, family, colleagues… ok we don’t really need to know this but what if you’re 60, 70 or 80 plus years old and you don’t get out much anymore because you can’t. Your family are too far and too busy to visit everyday, your partner is deceased, you live on your own or maybe in sheltered accommodation. What then if you could send a poke or a smiley face to your grandchildren via Facebook or view the pictures they constantly post of themselves doing silly things, wouldn’t it be great to receive emails from family & friends, even if once a week. Wouldn’t it be even greater to Skype someone especially on special occasions because you can’t be with them. Wouldn’t it finally be great to pay that gas bill you’ve been meaning to get out to do.
Today I am mainly reading this. (I finished the Scarlet Letter by the way, felt like it was half a book. You could have told me that you’d stolen every second chapter and that would have made more sense). I know it wouldn’t represent Queeny, but this cover would have been amazing if it was a pug by the way!
It also provided me time to really take in my course surroundings, which consisted of downtown San Francisco, Fisherman's Wharf, Bay Bridge, Alcatraz, and the Golden Gate Bridge.
I should've done the last one. Instead I walked away, choosing to finish the book I was reading.
I made the little dangle hanging from the ribbon, the silver bead reminder me of butterfly wings, matching the wings on the bear! I distressed the edges of the blue layer a bit, that was new for me...I like how it softened it and helps the layer tie in with the fade on the swirl paper...I mean the butterfly trail paper...(or are they Flutter~bear trails, LOL)
(The box is on the same screen you enter your mailing address on, and the code should be entered exactly as I’ve typed it above.)
If not, no big deal.. I won't waste your time and you wont waste mine. I dno't spend time in conversations with people who are not willing to make a concerted commitment to seriously listen; not cause they have to, BUT BECAUSE THEY WANT TO.
Teen girl is doing super, she's now Y11 and still with the Cheerleading squad. She's still gorgeous and such a trooper, I'm so proud of her!
Democratic and Republican legislators are now set out to go it alone, with competing plans to cut the deficit and raise the debt limit, beginning a high-stakes game of chicken to see which side blinks first.
*While the images featured in the side-show are my own, I have taken the two photos of the women featured in the centre of the blog from google images and, therefore, cannot take credit for those two, I hope to replace them with my own images once I can!
But our mission isn’t complete; the doorman comes over.
Garry Borland - vocals, Richard Simpson - guitar, Jacqui Crane - bass, Murray Dalglish - drums.
After the tour, I would have to disagree about the whole adult thing. The campus is like a haven. Everything is contained and everyone is still holding your hand. A mother of a prospective student with me in the tour asked, “How do the kids remember to go to all these meetings?”. The tour guide, a college student herself, answered, “They remind us everyday all day.” Oh yeah. That’s just like the real world. Nobody reminds me to sign my timecard at work so I can be paid. Nobody reminds me to pay my credit card at the end of the month. Geez.
The shop sells Level 80, 90, 100, and 110 weapons. The prices are 20 coins, 25 coins, 30 coins, and 50 coins, respectively.
Ah yes, French voters. Enjoy your voyage...to the bottom.
and it all comes to me
· Introduction of coin/currency operated ticket vending machines.
For anyone that's ever had a glass of port, you know the deep level of flavor port has. A very dry, tart, spicy beverage, port is a fortified wine often bottled young and aged in the bottle, or aged for several years in oak. The barrel we used is from Dry Comal Creek in the Hill Country, and aged port in it for 2 years prior to our acquiring it. Port is a strong wine, often around 20% alcohol by volume, giving it a bright warmth, notes of earthy spice, vinous/leathery, and berry and fig characteristics. Aging our Belgian-style Dark Strong Ale in a port barrel is a wonderful marriage of flavor and complexity, giving it more acidity (tartness), dryness, and vinous characteristics. Some oxidation in the barrel occurs as well, complementing the attenuated ale and aged wine.
The personal trainer who is working with me has showed me so many exercises that include my stability ball, that I should never ever get bored working on that thing! I am so happy and grateful to this guy for encouraging me and showing me that I can do anything for 3 minutes!!! Thank you Scott!!! He is also a certified athletic trainer, so he understands my limitations regarding the life changing injuries I sustained falling from Sahib last summer. He has been careful to make a routine that doesn't tax the prosthesis in my right elbow, and he has showed me great exercises for the partially torn rotator cuff on my left side! in addition to those first noticed injuries, last fall, my right knee swelled and got incredibly painful, and in a few days ( as any orthopedic person will tell you), the quad strength in that leg was all but gone. I couldn't even climb the steps into the house with that leg, bending it past 45 degree was next to impossible, so I really struggled getting in and out of the bath tub. But I LOVE baths! So, with the help of my son, I was able to get in and out of the tub. the MRI showed a meniscal tear, and moderate degeneration of my medial and lateral cartilage. I knew I was in serious trouble... Had a cortizone injection done, and that took down the swelling but, didn't help the pain much, and certainly didn't make the weakness any better. Joining the gym has taken away all the pain in my knee!!! I was bracing myself for some more surgery this summer ( when I wouldn't have to do chores), thankfully, this is not going to be necessary!!! Yay for me!!!! My arms are both much stronger, and although I still have some tendonitis in my right arm ( probably always will, but it is tolerable), I can do things now! I dismounted from my lesson horse to the ground last Saturday!!!! I didn't know if I had the strength to support my body with that arm to a ground dismount, hurray I can!! I am celebrating my return to fitness!!! YES!!! Abd as an added bonus, I get to watch some really beautifully muscular bodies around me work out!! I admit having a weakness for a chiseled muscular body, anyone with sculpted muscles gets my admiration!!
Brew Dog is a Scottish brewery known for huge, aggressive beers. I'm talking not just beers around 10% ABV, but 30 and 40! This is my first try of theirs, Dogma. It's a spiced beer full of ingredients I've never heard of like guarana and kola nut.
Like, totally.
#4 - I WON THE LOTTERY!!!!
1/2" Circle Small Punch (119869)
All together now, "Hello Brandon"
They knew better than to forbid me to come (despite the fact I am using their money) but they let me know they were furious. They were worried about the drive, I didn’t really know you, blahblahblah . . .
But, as I have said before - Why Won't The Unions Fight For Control Of Our Pensions - there is a solution to this short of the revolution. If every socialist, every trade unionist became an active member of the Co-op, we could demand an opening of its books, we could see exactly where the money is going. The Co-op says that much of its costs are due to the external costs of investment management. If that is the case, then there is a good case for bringing that in house to rein in those costs. Perhaps they could ask the Mondragon Co-op to take it over for them! But, having obtained that control, having created the kind of pension System that the workers at Mondragon are able to enjoy, then it should be incumbent upon our Trade Unions to insist that the money in all our other Pension Schemes be transferred to it, and that real Workers Control be exercised over it.
If you haven't checked out the knitting (crocheting, quilting, etc.) sections of your nearby libraries, you may be pleasantly surprised. In both the county library near my home and the metropolitan library system in the next county, there's a decent selection of both classic and more recent titles in the craft sections. I have borrowed Judith Durant's One Skein Wonders series, Barbara Walker's treasuries of stitch patterns, the Stitch 'n' Bitch books, Joelle Hoverson's Last Minute Knitted Gifts, and many others. If you like vintage patterns, you might find those, too.
In the annals of rock and roll history there have been numerous groundbreaking and important albums released, way too many to mention in a short list here. “Game changers” from Sgt. Peppers to Enter the 36 Chambers are discussed, disputed, diluted and written about ad nauseam. From talking heads on VH1 (and bloggers such as us) to the employees of record and music stores worldwide, there are oft agreed upon standards of excellence that these records have established. You will be hard pressed to find someone who doesn’t at least appreciate the significance of OK Computer or the influence of London Calling.
but I'm with Gaijin husband who thinks japanese eat sushi for every occasion in Japan LOL
Earlier this year, Patriot idled three smaller central Appalachian thermal coal mines that together produced about 1.2 million tons in 2011.
I don't know why, pink and red always call for my Bo Bunny paper pad which I love:-)! Close up on my image and challenges...
2120 Southgate Road
I am still a little nervous about the cookout. Controlling the eating in that environment will be a challenge. I am looking at it as an opportunity to test myself. If I can avoid overeating and eating the foods that I should be staying away from then I know that I have really made a fundamental change in how I control my behavior around food. Certainly, passing on the smoked ribs will be hard… Not nibbling all day will be the truest test. With so much good stuff around, it will really test my resolve to avoid the constant taste testing that this has been for me in the past. Like an alcoholic at a wine tasting, I will have to remind myself continually of what I am trying to accomplish, why even a one-day slip is not something I can allow, not yet. Stay with the plan: 2000 calories or less, even at a party, even with all the weight that has come off. Have to stay the course. Have to keep the focus.
6. Who is your anti relationship in 2?
The buy one get one free deal is only good on polishes from these collections. It also appears that you must already have an account on Zoya.com for this promotion to be applicable.
To recap, in Scots Law, perjury is committed by a witness or party knowingly making false statements under oath in court proceedings. The matter has to be of relevance to the proceedings in which the allegedly perjured evidence is given, and requires to be material.
to trust in the new day, new beginnings.
Gotta make it somehow
MAKE IT SO NUMBER 1.
Dear Golddigger,
Gerardo: I was watching you touch yourself.
I should point out firstly that I was sent two tapes of this show - one was labelled the 'evening' show, the other - the same show - simply was labelled 18th May and was the tape I used here. I should also mention that the tape labelled the 'matinee' show was the recording the 'Hot Shit' bootleg labels the evening show.
"Some people!" he said.
As you all know we are re-doing our kitchen and are purchasing a full kitchen set with a 5 year warranty on all 4 pieces. (Oven, Over the range microwave, refrigerator and dishwasher.)
Director : Guy Hamilton
Justice David Medina noted that a 65 percent accuracy rate would have earned the test an F in a school setting. "To incarcerate somebody for one day, you use a standard that's not even A-plus?" Medina asked lawyers for Bell County. "That seems wrong on its face."
Day 1 in Linda Rief's classroom started with advisory. Advisory is a time to get settled, to work on projects, to plan or update calendars. There are no school bells at Oyster River Middle School. I never realized what a difference that makes. No rush. No clock watching. No running-out-of-time feeling.
They might say I should change my style.
On the way to my house there is a place where the road curves and winds in the middle of a dark forest. There aren’t many houses along that stretch of winding road, which is known as the “S” curves to all the locals. This stretch of road is as treacherous as it is beautiful in the winter.
Bible study (The Power of a Praying Wife, Stormie OMartian) first thing this morning, home for a few chores and then off to my oldest daughter's Cross Country meet. She did so awesome...***caution bragging mom moment*** She placed 55th out of probably 200 girls of which were 6th, 7th, and 8th graders running. My daughter is in 6th...you do the math....she kicked some serious older kid butt, and ended up 10th overall for 6th graders!!! I told you I was THAT mom!!! Last on the list is Open House for my other daughter. She is also gonna kick some butt later this month at her cross country meet!...:)
In addition to companies and species, we, people, can view this lesson through the lens of psychology. In Gerald Schueler’s essay, “CHAOS THEORY: INTERFACE WITH JUNGIAN PSYCHOLOGY, The Order/Chaos Relationship in Complex Systems,” Scheuler describes modern chaos theory addressing complex systems, where he states that, “not only is our body a dissipative system, but or ego as well.” Our body is made of organs and their physical systems, and our ego is made up of psychological components and processes, and inherited dispositions otherwise known as character constituents. “Jung asserts that chaos theory is applicable to the holistic unity of the mind, brain, behavior and environment, and that none should be examined as a separate entity but rather ‘their mutually interactive and complex processes comprise an organic entity.’” “Jung taught that the components of the ego-complex are held together by the gravitational force of their relation to consciousness. (Pascale, 1992)” This brings to light that the “total manifestation of the psyche as a natural phenomenon is a highly complex structure (Jung, 1954, p. 91, 92).”
Good Morning WORLD……. Today is a new day that none of us has ever seen…. so what are YOU going to do with it!! Positivity is KEY — Because today is surely not promised to any of us so I have started dancing until my feet hurts… laughing until my side aches…..
Remember your story from lesson one? Think back to your childhood.
Birds of Prey Issue 1
Back when we were painting the room I was searching Craigslist and Ebay for
#6 1988 Gilbert Contreras El Paso High 1500 Meters 3:51.9
TILDA: Rare, please.
I have a long running habit of sleeping in my car at trailheads before climbs, and have done it before one other race. I purchase vehicles with this in mind, so I am able to lay out my exped mat and down sleeping bag. Its much more comfy then one might think, and I feel more a part of things. Even better, the drive is short in the morning!
Race record – Starts: 35; 1st: 15; 2nd: 4; 3rd: 3; Win & place prize-money: £766,407
This is good. I’m very proud that our church is like this; Gospel-centered and relatable.
“It was never going to be an ordinary day. Ordinary days do not exist in the lives of those living in conflict zones marred by war and if you are a woman belonging to a certain ethnic group then life’s ordinariness lies in it’s not being ordinary. “
OH! OH OH!! I have to tell you who wrote this!! You will NOT get over this! You know who wrote Queen Of Outer Space? Do you? You won't believe this. The writers of this macho, men-overpowering-women space soap opera are none other than Charles Beaumont and Ben Hecht.
You can donate to Librotraficante's work. Though the caravan itself will end on the 17th, Librotraficante will continue its work at providing books to "Underground Libraries".
Ford: Gingrich is a serious thinker who thinks
Brush a large baking sheet with curry butter and lay your squash rounds down on the baking sheet. Scoop filling into the center of the rings and drizzle the remaining curry butter over the squash. Bake until squash is tender about 30 minutes. Use a spatula to transfer rings to plates when serving, so filling isn't left behind.
“Why don’t you try to love someone else. Like… Jessica maybe?” Said Sooyoung as she’s looking at Jonghyun.
“SENSITIVITY TRAINING for every employee in Quebecor and its subsidiaries who earn over $90,000 a year. The sensitivity training should be no less than 3 hours and should build awareness and sensitivity of trans, transsexual, transgender, two-spirited and intersex identities and experiences with the goal of building a long term capacity for equality and respect of diversity in your corporation.”Erickson has other demands including a public statement from the company on trans issues and an audit of our portrayal of trans people to make sure it is to his liking.
This young gull (his plumage still changing from juvenile to adult) had chosen a different strategy and was strutting his stuff on a wall, hoping to make an individual appeal to passers-by, many of whom had called in at the fish & chip shop and therefore possibly had titbits to share.
Someone else on the shuttle bus was in worse shape, though. Lucien, who was standing next to me, suddenly said the words every plane-fearing mother on her way to certain doom loves to hear -- "Mommy, I'm gonna be sick."
Is a serif font inherently cooler than a sans serif?
I die cut the large white doily on the Silhoette and made the huge pink flower accents with the new Donna Downey/Unity stamps.
Everyone knows that you can find the best deals on computers and electronics online. Wouldn’t it be nice to find those same massive discounts on things like designer clothes, jewelry and watches or women’s shoes? The fact is that you can. Over the past five years or so, the internet marketplace has undergone its own Big Bang, and the result is a whole universe of shopping choices for all the things that you want most. That only leaves one question – where are all the bargains?
Here's where to send your respectful but firm letters and or emails of support, and be sure to include the File Number File No. 10-CP-62157:
the master’s concerns. Now we hear that it is the task of women of Color to
We just arrived in Cuzco. The hotel is awesome. We have hot water, heat electricity for more than four hours in the evening, and toilet paper we can actually flush down the toilet. Don’t get me wrong; I loved the jungle, but it made me realize how much we take for granted. Plus, after two nights under a mosquito net, everything from here on out is going to seem swanky by comparison.
3. To acknowledge God’s place in every part of our life is the first step toward successful living
8 several
Jonghyun : The day when SHINee just arrived in Japan, I could remember how nervous (I) was regarding our dreams. Mostly, we are thankful that you were all able to accept/acknowledge us, foreigners. We wanted to bring joy through our voices to everyone, however, were we able to do it with Japanese? We are not too sure, so we were really worried. You have given us Japanese study materials as presents and even learnt Korean so that you were able to communicate with us…. (your gestures) constantly warming our hearts forever.
Zeus and Poseidon was at a dawn of war because during winter solstice, Zeus’ symbol of power, lightning rod was stolen and he is giving Poseidon until the end of summer solstice to search for it. Or else, world war 3 will approach.
8. New England- I am a total New England girl to the core. I was born and raised here and even if the BF and I were to move away we would eventually come back to raise our kids here. Everything I love is here: my family, my friends, the Red Sox, the four seasons, snow, Maple Syrup, the ocean, Maine Lobster, and the list could go on for ever and ever.
The UK has a hosepipe ban. Ridiculous really considering the amount of rain that fell when I was there. But at least when you turn on the tap you get water. It's a different story here. The start of summer brings the regular water cuts. Since I returned the water has been off for around 4 hours every day. It wouldn't be so bad if they switched it off at the same time each day, so you could plan when to shower, switch on the washing machine, do the washing-up and water the garden. But that doesn't happen.
It's a neutral space with nothing too flash or poppy so for those who have been waiting (far too patiently!) for the reveal I hope its simplicity doesn't disappoint :-)
Shadowcry (The Secrets of Wintercraft) by Jenna Burtenshaw
I worked on and sent two along to Michael very late last year just before I left to go overseas.
“Thank you – Flawless Service!”
P.P.S. – Taiwan MapleStory is also getting an exclusive hero with the Justice (AKA Destiny) patch. It was described as a pirate with a gun, could it be the pirate hero? Is GMS also getting it?
They were pretty happy about it. They both screamed "YAY!! Islander's awesome!! Road-trip, Road-trip, ROAD-TRIP!!" I was still pissed though, I demanded Sita to give me one of the toy rats that I kept on the Dashboard so I could use it as a stress doll. I don't think it help them see how angry I was since whenever I squeezed it, it squeaked. This along with the stead chant of "I just wanted some dam Pancakes" didn't help the matter either. In anycase we finally made it to the spot known as the Grease Trucks on the campus. Pretty much its a parking lot with several food trucks and a few tables for kids to eat at. Dreamer, Greenday and I got our food. Now, this sandwich which I had been reluctant to drive to get, was truly epic. You could put anything on the dam cheese-steak you wanted. As an example, Dreamer got Chicken Fingers, mozzarella sticks and French fries on his. I ate this thing and felt so fat afterward, but it was so good. The other two got two sandwiches each (One for then and one for the next day). Unfortunately Sigma and Sita didn't wan't anything from there so we had to go find yet another place to eat for them.
“Drew Black, a president of the SBC fighting organization, is a controversial as they come. But this hotheaded entrepreneur is a perfect match for his popular sports club venture: uncompromising and extreme. Maybe too extreme. With a reputation for saying what he thinks, Drew’s been causing a lot of friction. That’s why someone’s been called in to clean up his image, before he does any permanent damage.
La pluie et le froid gachent la fin de saison.
circuit and through my Swedish friends about how remarkable Tomas Tranströmer’s work was. However, when I read the available translations of the day by May Swensen and Robert Bly, who helped to popularize his work in the US, I was unimpressed. The work seemed to be fairly conservative and the syntax not that highly interesting, so that I determined either he was not a very good poet or that these poems were badly translated. Certainly his work did not seem as exciting to me as Gunnar Eckelöf and others.
Funnily enough I don't have any current Stampin' Up! stamps with 'new home' on so I improvised here. I typed the sentiment on the PC and punched out using the Word Window and Modern Label punches. The patterned papers are both from the Brights Designer Series Paper Stack and the house is made using the Small Tag, 1 1/4 inch square and the 1/2inch circle punches. Topped off with the Two Step Bird punch and a Basic Rhinestone Gem.
As for me, I'm feeling much better than I did after giving birth to Aidan. I'm able to do everything that I usually do around the house and have minimal pain. It's been great, because I really don't know what kind of shape we'd be in if I was feeling as poorly as I did after my first pregnancy.
but this is the kind of food that's helping me lose weight.
One night I took her to see a new play by a black playwright. It was a very angry play, but very funny. Typical black American humor. The audience was mostly black, and everybody was laughing and clapping and hollering like they were in church. After the play was over, my friend started talking about why black people were so angry all the time. I said it was a matter of remembering—nobody asks why Jews remember the Holocaust, I think I said—and she said that’s different, and I said it wasn’t, and she said that anger was just a dead end. We had a big fight, right in front of the theater. When we got back to the car she started crying. She couldn’t be black, she said. She would if she could, but she couldn’t. She could only be herself, and wasn’t that enough.
Me: Oh yes you will. The person who is staying home does the housework. That's the rule.
C’mon, guys. I call on all of you to knock it off.
I also loved the two friends that got together and made me about 8 different freezer meals to have on hand after the baby comes. And - even more amazing - they made me a gallon ziplock bag full of mix for the Cake Mix Pancakes that I have been dreaming about! I kind of wanted to cry when I saw it...but then I remembered grownups don't usually cry over pancakes. Not in public, anyway.
Miss Kay went red.
what I call “The push-button life”. This
In midst of all this, I forgot to tell you that Porus was able to thwart Alexander’s plans just by being himself. He had lost the battle but when Alexander asked him how he’d like to be treated, Porus said, “treat me the way one king treats another.” Now, if nothing else proves that Porus was a Punjabi, that does – doesn’t it? (Ask a Punjabi to find out.)
Once a dog is infected, symptoms are diffuse, and only specific tests can determine if the problem is Blastomycosis. Watch for coughing, difficulty breathing, depression, skin lesions (like large pimples), and eye irritation. An exact diagnosis can only be made by a veterinarian who is looking for this specific problem. Since it is rare in Michigan, vets may not be looking for it.
Lotus F1 Team completed only morning session running due to inclement weather on the first of three days testing at the delightfully located Autodromo Internazionale del Mugello in Italy. Jérôme D’Ambrosio sampled the E20 for the first time, completing 40 trouble free laps. Because of today’s weather-induced reduced running, Romain Grosjean will drive for the next two days – contrary to the original plan of Kimi Räikkönen running tomorrow and Romain only on Thursday – due to the uncertain weather predictions for the next two days.
I made these for the "super duper vegan picnic" that was held last weekend and everyone who had a taste was a fan. They probably would have thought less of me if they knew how easy it was.
“Mimi, I don’t understand?” Roger replied, feeling the slow lurching sensation within the centre of his chest at the slow realisation that the person he loved most in the world was slipping from his grasp. Slowly.
What’s most impressive in this book is the depth of Sanderson’s world building. From some cursory research, I gather that the magic, religion and politics of the novel, fits in with the philosophy of Sanderson’s other works. This definitely comes over in this book. It occasionally feels a little clunky; too much telling, rather than showing, particularly in the early part of the novel. What I liked about it though, is that the magic system works like science. Often in fantasy novels the magic comes complete, with the characters (and therefore the reader) rarely questioning how it works. Here, the most powerful wielders of ‘Breath’ have had to research as they go, and much like science, their answers reveal yet more questions. Magic effects the senses, but can also be imbued into real objects, or stored for later use. The system described remains consistent and is well realised, better still, the novel’s characters use it in innovative ways that have unexpected consequences for the story.
Here's some forsythia-themed ideas I might be doing if I had any time whatsoever to do them. :) Enjoy.
The game plan is to try to get my first day of biking in on Monday. That way I have three other days to choose from in order to meet my two-day minimum.
I only have to see
So we made that special journey all the way to the tip of Finistère, visiting the little towns of Concarneau and Douarnenez, going cross-country up and down the peninsula, admiring the rocky coastline, stopping in Lochronan, being reminded of Tintagel in Cornwall by its granitic architecture, strolling through a quiet market in the suburb of Quimper. And what about the quaint little streets of Quimper lined up with artisans and delicatessen and rows of flower pots on the pavement outside florists’ shops?! We learnt about BZH, calvaires, menhirs, vieilles charrues, binious and chapeaux ronds as well as oignons (including the ones one wears around the neck of course!), artichauts and choux-fleurs… and of course last but not least, we made friends with the legendary Bécassine.
This salad is ment to be an appetizer, but I would eat it as maindish and dessert all together!Since I came to Sweden I haven't eaten it, and I really miss it. I once bought from the supermarket a can with eggplant salad, but it was so groce.. I tried to add chopped onion and mayo, but it was no good and I tossed it immediatelly. And I decided I should call my mom and ask her exactly what I need and how was she doing it for me when I was little so I can reproduce it and make my little dream come true!
I sewed across one angled end, along the shorter side, turned another corner and sewed across the other angled end, leaving a gap to turn the scarf through. It turned through a treat, so I then top stitched the side and ends and left the unsewn side, well, unsewn. The longer side is about 82 inches, the shorter about 70 inches and the width around 5.5 inches. You know what? The lads think it’s very nice. You know what else? It is.
Thank you to everyone who was able to join us for our last challenge! We sure had some amazing entries. It was a VERY tough choice, but here are our picks for Top 3 this week:
What a gift. Thank you, Mary Ann and Kathy, and all of you, for the reminders of love, friendship and connectedness we all share.
The trip went by too fast, I didn’t want to say goodbye. The connection and love I felt from this dear family will forever bless my heart. I miss them all and look forward to our Sedona vacation next year.
O-Oil-What kind do you use? Olive oil
Heavy use of kola nut or drinking large quantities of cola beverages has been associated with bone loss in adults and inhibition of bone formation in adolescents. Some practitioners are recommending that teenagers should restrict intake of soft drinks containing cola in order to lower their risk of osteoporosis in later life.
Hurt me.
One thing I'm sort of disappointed in thus far (and maybe I'm just missing it), but I can't seem to find a blogger app!
The woman leaves after awhile, closing me in the crate again. A few hours later, Dad arrives.
Also - entering this card in ...
Nationalisation has become a dirty word due to its association with top-heavy bureaucracy and its inherent inefficiency through bad management and strike-happy workers. This was certainly the case in the socialised control of the UK's infrastructure, but real nationalisation doesn't have to be that way.
1. Remember that excrutiating pain I had weeks ago? They took me off the bone strengthing injections snd suddenly the pain was gone
Except more iPhone posts. Because I can at least take twenty minutes to get some iPhone pics up. Then the blog doesn't look so lonely and forlorn with a week old post date.
When we came back from our holiday at the end of march we made a decision. I wanted to re-start my home day care but I didn’t want to do it in our house because it is too small. With 6 children you just cannot leave your stuff everywhere like you would normally.
How do you inspire the team to generate great ideas?
Roy John Penketh (English Democrats) 806 (28%)
To potentiate the experience.
(The professor shook his head with a smile, beginning to realize where the argument was going)
And while you are at it, enjoy the one right that the powers that be will never attempt to take away from you…
2-4 mozzarella string cheeses
Well ok, she didn’t right away. Shu kinda rescued her a bit and got more severely wounded, so she used the last moments of her healing void to heal him. And then she dies.
